Criminal Gang in South Africa Attempt to Rob the Wrong Person

Aaaaah, that nice fresh date stamp in the corner. This is new shit.
This was such a pleasant and far more satisfying ending. I was 100% expecting a gun fight 
Never mess with somebody who doesn't give a fuck about their car. 
I wonder what went wrong inside? 
He had the right idea ramming him in reverse. You can do that all day long, not sure why he turned around to come back and probably fuck up the radiator in his badass little car. I always get my ass handed to me in car threads but I suppose that could be a rear engine Fortwo which is available in SA, but I think the cooling is still in front. Judging by how he comes back to crush them he was probably pretty satisfied with that spot to make his final stand.
Jesus GTA is real
So..... based on what I know from all the saffas I meet my assessment is this: bunch of fucked up as hell wannabe car jackers spot a guy (or gal) who's just pulled into their driveway, gate is open. Opportunity. So they jump out tooled up and head in to jack the car. Prospective victim spots them coming and is tooled up, presents a gun, they think fuck this. Wander off, still wasted, try to jack passing ute. Prospective victim thinks, fuck it, rams the shit out of them. 
Good, seems like this wasn't the first time. The person getting robbed finally had enough. 
Who the hell was it,  John Wick?
I know quite a few South African people through gaming. They take their home security very seriously. I'm surprised they didn't get their car blown up with a rocket launcher to be honest 
Never fuck with the guy with a expendable car.
All these South African robberies at gunpoint are why Elon Musk moved to America, and is trying to get even further away by going to mars. 

In all seriousness, he wants nothing to do with South Africa, his birth country, ever again. His school asked for money, and he gave them some on the condition they never talk to him again. He also doesn't like donating to SA causes because of his bad experience there.
*no mercy*
Tge only way to stop a bad guy with a car is a good guy with a car. 
Wish the world can see that this happens every day in South Africa! 
I think that guy actually shot at the random truck passing by too.
And I’m coming back to finish it.
In my country the guy smashing the robber's car would be charged with attempted murder and probably spend more time in jail than the robbers. Thank God this is South Africa.
I guess you could say they got instant Car-ma
Funny thing is if they die he could be charged with murder.
John Wick?
r/unexpected
ITT: "South Africa is the worst place in the world."
Why didn’t they drive off?? Why did he just hop in the back seat?
The first time the black car gunned it hard into reverse, my reaction was identical to that of Z on It's Always Sunny during Charlie's song --*"Oh shit."*

I completely did not expect the second smashing which was way more satisfying, definitely was like "Oh, *shit."*
For a second I thought the guy drove off to get groceries after ramming them.
That dude and his gun don't appear to be impressing anyone...
"Why are you running? Why are you running?!"
My friend and I had to spend roughly 10 hours in Johannesburg. Our friend Mikhail found a kamikaze driver to take us on a tour through the city center. We, the two retards, thought that they were exaggerating about the danger just to frighten us. We thought that we’d get to the center, take a long good stroll through it and show everyone that Russians aren’t afraid of anything.

We ended up not even coming close to doing any of these things.

The reason?

We nearly shat ourselves.

The descent to Johannesburg from the plateau made the city look great. Beautiful, big, modern. Some skyscrapers here and there, some nice Victorian-style buildings. Green lawns, blue sky.

Upon actually entering the city, the picture changed drastically.

It looked completely abandoned.

There was no electricity.

Prior to riding into the city, the driver appointed by Mikhail read us a short “do’s and don’ts” lecture. He seemed very tense, gulping often and suspiciously looking around as he spoke:

“If you cunts want to survive this, do exactly as I say.

After we enter the city, NO LOUD NOISES, do not ATTRACT ANY ATTENTION!

NO FUCKING IPHONES OR CAMERAS flashing through the car windows!

DO NOT MAKE EYE CONTACT with ghouls! (that’s what he called blacks)

And no matter what happens, DO NOT OPEN THE WINDOWS!

Because suddenly a lamp post can fall and block the way, and the ghouls will fucking siege us.

And remember that I have kids, so at least follow these rules for my sake…”

We spent two hours riding around the city center.

It was quiet enough in the bus to hear a pin drop.

To understand what happened to the city, a small historical flashback is needed.

After the apartheid was over, a two-million swarm of Africans flooded the city, opening the era of African Reconquista. They were not natives, they just left their usual places in the desert and went wherever life was better. Mikhail, the guy who got us the driver, lived in Johannesburg at that time and told us the following:

In the middle of an ordinary workday, something happened.

The office center’s doors opened and an unorganized crowd of several thousand blacks rushed in, carrying their belongings in huge bags. They asked us not to pay any attention to them and continue working, while they were spreading around the building and occupying every bit of territory that was available. Armchairs, stools, sofas, restrooms and hallways – they were everywhere, happily chatting and wasting no time in taking whatever shiny things the building’s original denizens had on them.

The office became filled with commotion. Chickens were butchered and gutted in the hallways, tables in audience rooms turned into cooking tables, restrooms became bathhouses.

The polite question “What’s going on?” was answered with “This is our home now.”

The subsequent, less polite question “What the fuck?!” met a reply “It will be better for everyone.”

Mikhail called the cops.

Cops didn’t come.

They apologized and explained that exactly the same thing was happening cross the entire city.

Then, everyone who could started to quietly flee the city, headed towards the suburbs and Cape Town, while erecting barriers to block the paths – hedges, moats, electrified fences. The last district of Johannesburg where you can meet a white man nowadays is the Pretoria suburb.

After a massive exodus, the owners of the buildings started thinking of what to do.

Bingo! They decided that if they switch off the electricity, water and sewer access to the buildings, the ghouls will leave them and return to the savannah.

So, they switched them off.

Ghouls didn’t even notice.

Of course, in the Savannah they had neither of these modern conveniences. “Where do they shit, then?” I asked Mikhail.

Mikhail replied that the office owners were also puzzled by this – and completely shocked after they found out.

You see, after invading the buildings, none of the ghouls could figure out what elevator shafts were for. Once they ripped out the elevator doors, they spent a few days scratching heads and spitting into the darkness, until it finally occurred to them.

“White people are geniuses when it comes to planning,” thought the ghouls, and the shafts became both toilets and garbage dumps ever since. According to Mikhail, it takes roughly ten years for an average ghoul horde to shit up an office building to the point of complete unliveability. After that, like in good old prehistoric times, the horde migrates to new pastures, occupying another building.

We rode on through Johannesburg’s streets, glued to the car windows, devouring the scenery with our eyes. Fashionable modern houses with boarded-up windows passed us by. When we came across a rare open window, we could see fires burning inside, with ghouls lying or walking around them.

(Once again) According to Mikhail, a new, albeit informal service appeared in Johannesburg. Bunches of tough guys go around offering to take the buildings back from ghouls. It happens like this: in the middle of the night several trucks drive up to the building, and one or two hundred armed thugs go inside. Quickly, they grab the sleeping ghouls and simply start throwing them out of the building, trying not to wake the whole horde up. Before the horde completely comes to its senses and starts expressing its displeasure, the thugs weld shut all doors and windows on the first floor and put up an electrified fence. After the building is cleaned and refurbished, it turns back into an office.

That’s how the remnants of Johannesburg’s white population live and work. In the evening and during the night they keep safe behind armored doors and private guards. In the morning they get into their cars and quickly, without stopping, ride outside their fortresses to work. After a short ride through more-or-less safe streets, they dive into one of the heavily guarded foxholes that leads to the underground parking garages. And that concludes their arrival to the workplace.

Another funny thing I noticed – if two “live” buildings are nearby, they are often connected by an aerial passage at the 10th or 11th floor. So office workers can even visit each other if they want to. The only trick to it is not to look down. Down there is ghoul territory.

The last guy out looks like he's been shot in the arse.
The gang robs the wrong person
Ahh..I see he has seen Zombieland as well. The old double tap rule
Now this is the kind of justice open I want to see!
#YOU PICKED THE WRONG HOUSE FOOL!
YOU PICKED THE WRONG HOUSE, FOOL!
In Spain you can't do that because the defendant in the trial would be you and you would have to pay a compensation to those thiefs
I think if I end up rich, I'll get a little beater car just for such an occasion.
Fok hulle op. Moenie die kak vat nie 
South African government is currently waging genocide against white people.
This is why Elon Musk doesn't live there any more. 
That was so satisfying...
If this were Germany, the wrong person would be charged with a crime.
South Africa is the perfect example of a shithole country. 
Its a pity none of those fuckers are dead. 
Fuck the ANC
Am I wrong, or did only one of the two guys who entered the property and went off frame return? Wonder what happened to the other guy?
Double tap.
I was hoping for some flamethrowers.
That guy that they tried to rob had seen some shit.
I've seen so many videos on r/watchpeopledie that I really thought this was going to go differently
I wasn't expecting the 2nd battering ram. Well played, well played! 
Who were they trying to rob? Jason Bourne?
Got damn he came back for more!
Uh. Didn’t two guys go in first?
I saw a flash and only saw 2 of the 3 come out 😬
I was kinda hoping the dude had a pet tiger or something exotic chase after the guy
Fuck yea
Didn't realize the Malachi brothers moved to South Africa.

i feel the hate from that bump
WCGW and a little bit of r/unexpected.
This homeowner has had enough of your shit
This is so south African I love it
When that car came back and rammed then again I knew there that driver meant business 
haha! now this is real! I cant even watch movies now without screaming n yelling at people, like PICK UP THE FUCKING 100s OF GUNS ON THE GROUND etc etc, back to topic, the reversing into them,and taking off in a huff thats real! but going back for a second head on smack!? thats alot of trust to put into a safety rating lol 
I appreciate the long run up he takes for the second hit
Smashing 
just been working with a guy from SA over the past year, he told me so many horrific stories of armed burglary, he himself had been shot while at a set of traffic lights while being car jacked. Obviously does not live there anymore. 
I hope people start defending themselves like this in Jamaica 
This is fucking real shit man
"I understand you had an accident. What I don't understand is how you accidently hit another car 13 times!". - old movie, prob not word for word
jesus christ. watching the second robber trying to get into the white car get thrown like 20 feet and slammed into the ground when the black car went in reverse was satisfying.
Went alright. Dude's car got a little dinged up...
Car Ramrod!
This is straight from a dark comedy... holy shit this was hilarious lol. 

Literally the *perfect* ending lol.
Dayum I saw the minivan nail them the first time and I was like Oh good now he's gonna get out of there, then he came back and nailed them again and I was like NO WAY DAYUM 😂
That guy just casually shooting the passing truck seems nice. 
They deserved that.
Criminal Kangz in Kangland. 
Too bad he didn't put a bullet in each of their heads. 
I think South Africa is turning into the new Brazil.
Thieves throw away their "person" card when they make the choice to try to take someone else's shit. Kill em all. 
Too bad there is a white genocide headed by the ANC going on in South Africa that the media is largely ignoring because it doesn't fir their agenda. They wouldn't ever want to protect white people or suggest a black person could ever do anything imperfectly. 

"Whites are ALWAYS the perpetrators and Blacks are ALWAYS the victims." - MSM (NBC, CNN, CBS, ABC)
Like I said no dog in the fight.  I haven’t visited South Africa, no family, nor do I plan on visiting. But it’s silly to deny reality.  This is from page one of a quick google search.  

https://www.google.com/amp/s/mobile.reuters.com/article/amp/idUSKCN1GB22I

https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.independent.co.uk/news/world/africa/south-africa-white-farms-land-seizure-anc-race-relations-a8234461.html%3famp

http://www.bbc.com/news/world-africa-31471427

https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.cnbc.com/amp/2017/12/20/ramaphosa-advocates-south-africa-seizing-land-without-compensation.html

http://www.news.com.au/finance/economy/world-economy/the-time-for-reconciliation-is-over-south-africa-votes-to-confiscate-whiteowned-without-compensation/news-story/a8a81155995b1adc1c399d3576c4c0bc


https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.businessinsider.com/south-africa-cyril-ramaphosa-wants-to-confiscate-white-farmers-land-2018-2

https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.rt.com/news/420181-south-africa-land-redistribution-explained/amp/




I think that wrong person to rob in SA would evidently be Oscar Pistorius
Hey white south africans, protip; buy a gun
Bunch of nogs
Too bad the robbers' car didn't caught fire so the fuckers would burn. Worthless scum.
That’s how you cover your asp 
/r/JusticeServed
I bless the gangs down in Africa. 
South africa is already a dumpster fire so yeah not sure if I should ve suprised.
[removed]
Hat a long way to run from the car to the house. Couldn’t pull up a little closer for a quicker escape? 
I really feel like the gaps here (audio and video), should they be filled, would create an amazing scene from a Guy Ritchie film... Something ridiculous/hilarious/violent led to this, and should result from it as well. Does /r/WritingPrompts accept video?
He is my hero . 
Is that my crazy ass sister in the car? 
This new version of Burnout looks dark on multiple levels.
John Wick is that you?
Damn he pulled that off straight gta style
What a mad lad
r/unexpected
Fuuuuuuck yes.
Holy fuck, that's hardcore.
Oh fuck yah

You picked the wrong car fool
This was all very confusing. 
What even happened


DOGGAMMIT!!!
He fired two rounds with his CAR.

Devastating.
GET FUCKED CRIMINAL FUCKS
holy fuck this guy has infinite T
YOU PICKED THE WRONG HOUSE FOOOOOOOOOL
Plot twist: There was no one in the car.
I lost it when he cane back for a second one 
Anyone else see the guy in the white shirt escaping into the bush? What a runner. Don’t think the other two did any running ever again though. 
What exactly backfired?

...

Oh...
Hope they died slowly. So satisfying.
Did that one guy get a wedgie from the occupants?
T.I.A mate
The angle of the camera had me wishing a car would just come and smash TF out of the get away car. And then it happened, it was glorious. 
I have a question : will the man that fought the robbers go in prison with them? Or did he have the right to do that?
Message from the king
Gangstaaa
In Spain you can't do that because the defendant in the trial would be you and you would have to pay a compensation to those thiefs
I was expecting a pack of dogs following them when they rushed back to the car. This was a much more satisfying ending though.
Hell FUCKING YEAH MAN.
I would've just run the car over them or push the car off the cliff. Wouldn't care if they died.
Did the last guy get a cap in his ass or something? :D

He actually ruined it for everyone by getting in the wrong door or else they would've got away
r/gifsthatkeepongiving
They must be driving a Nokia
I initially thought they were chasing the bird
Cue the Benny Hill chase music
South Africa seems nice.
Take away the South Africans and it is!


r/JusticeServed
Caught in a bad mood? That is what happens! hahaha
YOU PICKED THE WRONG HOUSE FOOL
Why would drive away from your house afte- oh.
"yeah yeah here's my wallet...I'm late for work!*blam* .....wait my Sam's card is in there.. "
I thought he was done after the first hit BUT HE CAME BACK 
Where are the scout robots from Tetravaal?
Chances are the white car was stolen anyway so no loss to the robbers.

r/gta_irl
r/justiceserved 
did you mean to type  r/justiceserved ?, I'm a bot beep boop and this action was performed automatically
And!! I’ve got no insurance!!
If this happened in my state in the U.S., the guy would be charged with attempted murder and the real criminals would go free. 
I swear this man was so fed up with blacks
I'm a bot, *bleep*, *bloop*. Someone has linked to this thread from another place on reddit:

- [/r/u_kukse] [oukay](https://www.reddit.com/r/u_kukse/comments/8dv7jb/oukay/)

- [/r/unpanderers] [Criminal Gang in South Africa Attempt to Rob the Wrong Person](https://www.reddit.com/r/UnPanderers/comments/8dvndj/criminal_gang_in_south_africa_attempt_to_rob_the/)

&nbsp;*^(If you follow any of the above links, please respect the rules of reddit and don't vote in the other threads.) ^\([Info](/r/TotesMessenger) ^/ ^[Contact](/message/compose?to=/r/TotesMessenger))*
Blacks are killing raping and torturing whites including children
Anyone know how car insurance would handle this case? If you were the one don't the ramming
It's an accident, you rammed, you are at fault.
Because it is also a vehicular assault and a crime itself your insurance wouldn't repair anything because your coverage ceases if you are committing a crime.
Ahhh it’s John Wick! 
Smart move ramming backward. Doesn't affect the car's drivability nearly as much as smashing the radiator in the front.
The people looked so small I seriously thought it was a group of kids fucking around with what I assumed to be toys, then shit got real. 
as opposed to the infamous non-criminal gangs?
Hopefully once the zoo  keepers got there, they were able to retain those animals and put them back in the zoo where they belongs. 
I think their problem was their pants were too tight. Look at them prancing around.
Car won't be covered by insurance for intentional damage.
That was very satisfying to watch.
I'm glad I kept watching until the end. 
r/instantkarma
Did anybody else notice one guy didn't quite make it in and got knocked over by the car?
Left rear passenger was still getting in when they got rammed.
I visited SA just after apartheid, for work. I was in Johannesburg. It was interesting. I think there was this feeling that because the government had changed that everything would change. Then they realized that it doesn't matter the gov. the people with the money still have the money. That was quite an eye opener for me. It applies to the west now.
John wick " the Boogeyman" spoted
A criminal gang, you say?
Criminal gang doing criminal gang stuff, nothing to see her- HOLY.SHIT
I really don’t understand what’s happening here. 
I have a specific set of skills 
Canadians, eh.
Fucking nuts there in South Africa! It looks like one guy didn’t come out.
This is fantastic, and has a real D-Fens vibe. As soon as I saw that car reversing I thought "YOU FORGOT THE BRIEFCASE!!!". For anybody confused, [here ya go](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2pMxjgrUE90).
Holy crap he came back and hit them again.. didn’t see that coming at all lol
first time i dont second guess about up voting. I loved that they rammed they shit out the robbers a second time and F U C K them up! Jajajajajajaja
same car both times?  
LPT: If you need to ram something with your car, use the rear bumper. The radiator is usually right behind the front bumper, and damage to it can overheat your engine in minutes.
That 2nd ram was not a good move. Could have easily been shot trying to back up or made their own vehicle inoperable. 
Not as good as shooting all three of them dead but still satisfactory.
Anyone else wondering why three why in and only two came out?
Love it. Why did he exit the building holding his ass like that. Shotgun to the midriff maybe?
2meirl4me
John Wick that you?
It’s a shame about South Africa. Used to be a nice stable country and now look at it. 
Was not expecting that.
3 ran in 2 came out
That's how you play gta V in real life
WAIT FOR IT!
_Jirre genaade..._
Careful who you mess with kids. 
o shit he came back for seconds 
inb4 reddit is sad the robbers had to have their cars dented despite them doing literally nothing wrong..
That was great.  Very satisfying 
Leaked footage of DIE HARD 5
I loved that second ram for one reason, the thiefs won't be able to escape on that car which makes it easier for police force to identify/catch them.
That guy smashes.
From a legal/liability standpoint, what happens? Does insurance pay for this?
I don’t think anyone will know what happened...I doubt the criminals will come forward saying “we tried to rob him and he nearly killed us!” And if he’s rich enough to rob he probably won’t worry about it
#BEEEEWWWW!!  



edit:boo!
When are these people gonna learn that no one is taking there shit with robbing anymore. People out here ready to die for there's, I know I'd be damned if someone came at me with that bullshit
What I'm wondering is what the hell flew out of the car? Was a bird or bat just chilling underneath until they stopped?
What are the self defense laws there like? Could the victim have killed them in their vehicle and been alright?
Why do they run so weird?!
What a fucking savage
Umm does insurance cover this? 
Does everyone know the sub to see things like this?
That sux
Always double tap
that's some GTA shit. nice
Should have run the fucker over 
That impact was spicy
r/watchpeopledie
They steal john wick's dog
Y'know, that first guy out of the building could have been fine if he'd gotten into the driver's seat and left instead of waiting for his buddies...
Thats what you get when you mess with John Wick in Africa.
Never bring a gun to a car fight.
What a total fucking legend that fella is. Love this shit. 
Anyone won the room temperature challenge? 
They deserve it
Too bad he didn't drive ab F-250.
Boola boola boola
What a shitty gang
wild horses would not get me to Africa
Gangbangers, you gotta love em!
John f*****g Wick in action  ladies and gentlemen
Are crime rates higher in South Africa than other African countries or do we just hear about it more? Everything I've heard makes South Africa seem like a total hell hole.
Tears in my eyes. -This post on the same day as justice Santa in Paris. Best justice day. 
What a ride.
Love that they came back to kaboom those mfers one more time
Surprise motherfuckahs!   
Damn South Africa is fucked 
This is EXACTLY why you don't go around robbing and killing random people's dogs because you never know [who you fucked with](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lhAcGOeeljc)
“Well I’m getting charged either way now, might as well do it right!”
Watch the guy with the gun, when the the homeowners car hits backs into them. 
r/unexpected
Expected the victim to give chase with an AK but this was a lot better.
"oh he's driving off now that he's disabled their car"

"holy shit!" 
Oh South Africa, you're slowly becoming the new Mexico
Probably some black guys trying to rape and kill some white farmers. 
Guns work better and are cheaper than f’ing up you car
But ain't as safer ^^^they ^^^had ^^^guns ^^^too
That robbery victim just made the #1 spot on the list of people you DO NOT fuck with.

TIA

This is Africa.
Hahaha suck shit you little rats hope they all ended up on life support little scumbags deserved it i would of done worse to them 
> would of
Yea what of it 
Makes no sense.
Then dont read it 
This response makes no sense. Are you not willing to learn from your mistake?
Of course not.   He's an idiot
Have you not got the memo? Using correct language is a form of oppression by the social elite. 2018, it's a weird place.
You're not too bright, are you?
"Would have" is what you should have said.
This is what happens in countries where guns are illegal for citizens.  
How about you do a little research before sharing your ill-informed contributions. Just because you are able to comment, doesn't mean you should. A [quick trip to Wikipedia] (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Firearm_legislation_in_South_Africa)would have set you straight.
What a fucking shithole.
If we were allowed to react like this to criminals without being charged in America the crime rate would drop. 
Yea... because the crime rate is so low in South Africa.
I live in Miami and have a ridiculous lifted truck with a winch on the front and steel bumpers in the front in rear. I wanted to get ride of it when I moved here but after watching for months now how people drive here and being hit twice myself, I’m glad I kept it. No damage from either accident to my vehicle but the other peoples cars, they needed a lot of work.
Why do they all get in the back of the car? That doesn't look like a self driving vehicle to me...🤔
[deleted]
[Whatchu' saying?](https://media.giphy.com/media/QyA6ug9RLz2mI/giphy.gif)
[deleted]
That's really only in Cape Town, and recent rains have pushed out that Day Zero scenario somewhat.
If the occupant of the black car gets shot and dies, after the second ramming, is it a legitimate claim for self defence? 
this will be america in a few years unless we ban guns
I mean, he's straight up trying to kill them, yeah? I don't think we should be clapping along, even if they are robbers
fuck that, let em die
Okay, but maybe there's a bit more moral grey area here. If they're running away, then there isn't any protection going on. From the video they didn't succeed in taking anything, so restitution isn't a factor. Killing them won't rehabilitate them. There's no advantage from them dieing, it just seems cruel and vengeful.
Cant even begin to imagine why white people efter set foot there.


What a fucking shithole.
Some were born there, but mostly because they own everything.
Who pissed in you're Rice Crispies?
South Africans.
> why white people efter set foot there.

Colonialism, innit.
To seize the land and colonize it. Literally. Read a book.
Thats what humans do tho.

Its just that they fucked up thinking that shithole was a good place to colonize.


Indian and Chinese trade drove European Courts mad.
Should have just stayed home and 420d. 
Date strap in corner said it was 19th. Probably trying to get some money together for a good 420.
Quickly to the batmobile
That is so me! I have a bad temper and old enough that I really don't give any fucks anymore, kids are all grown up and gone. I could see me doing this!
[Here’s a NOFX song about South Africa!](https://youtu.be/LaAv8qMkSk8)
They all run in an odd way...
So much racism here.
Im 100% the car is bulletproof. But what he did to scare the guys and why he didnt kill in the sight if he is willing to risk going after they?
Why are you 100% sure that the car is bulletproof? I don’t see any bullets being shot at it
Ye facking twat coont!!! That's how we do it in south afrikir!! Now let's go find some non whites to oppresse the shit out of
You smell that? It's that new gif smell. 
In 2026 people will be reposting it 
The most wonderful thing is that you wrote that without mentioning the date. And since you have the top comment it will also be reposted along with the gif by bots from now onwards. 
Aaaaah, fresh OC from good ole /u/Uncle_Retardo 
And here I was thinking it was German as fuck. 
Repost /s
It's a unicorn. 
I'll see this again in a few years.
My wife has been making lists of all the places she wants to go.  I've made her move South Africa back towards the bottom at least in terms of order we will visit.  It doesn't seem like the best time to drop by lately.
And not a shit post either 
I love when he come back at the end to ram the car a second time after I thought it was over.
Me too. I was expecting a much bigger gun and rapid fire wasting the mofos. 
That guy knows how to use a car as a weapon. Both hits were on point.
strangely I was expecting a tiger to come running out after them. I dunno why.
r/gifsthatendtoosoon
Here is the full video with sound: https://twitter.com/crimeairnetwork/status/987532349654134784
[r/JusticePorn](https://youtu.be/dQw4w9WgXcQ)
Damn they came back with the second hit. That was worth the watch
I was expecting a tank 
Then you should watch r/watchpeopledie 
I too expected to find the property owner barging out at top speed holding a sawn off shotgun, or he had let loose 4 burly German Shepherds or something.  

The ending was unexpected and sweet
I was hoping to see one of the robbers crawling away horribly injured.. I’m sure they’ll just steal another car and get back at it. 
I was expecting a lion kept as a guard-dog.
I would have easily preferred sizeable exit wounds through the chests as they were running away and would have called it justice. 
Yeah, this actually was very funny and entertaining to watch. Almost like a scripted comedy 
Hold my beer while I back into your vehicle and send you flying to the dirt.
So, why did they run back out? And the guy was so mad he didn’t even care about his car 
r/unexpected
In England the home owner would be in serious legal trouble. You are now allowed to use "reasonable force" but it needs serious justification to the police (and maybe in a court), and even that is only allowed inside your home. Doing this outside your house would put this guy in serious legal trouble. Probably huge fines and jail. 
Daily Mail memes do permeate real life!
Are you suggesting what I said is wrong in some way? 
I'm suggesting you don't know what you're talking about and that a diet of unexamined Daily Mail articles has warped your impressionable mind.

The CCTV footage would likely exonerate the homeowner under the following legislation: https://www.legislation.gov.uk/ukpga/1967/58/section/3

If someone in the car was seriously injured, he may be arrested (and frankly, that's probably a good thing) but there's no guarantee he would face 'serious legal trouble'.

Educate yourself. Stop reading the Mail.

https://thesecretbarrister.com/2018/04/05/bashing-burglars-and-the-law-of-self-defence/
You have it the wrong way round, what I'm saying is right, what you are saying is some sort of rant based on the assumption that I read nothing but the Dail Mail which I never read. Chasing attempted thieves in your car and ramming into them twice, is not reasonable force. You know this, which is why you are insulting me, because you can't argue it properly. 
You are ignoring reasonable use to force in prevention of crime or affecting the legal arrest because you don't want to see it. You are stuck on the fact it was outside the property when it isn't particularly relevant.

Sure, there's a debate to be had over the application of the term 'reasonable'. But CPS, a magistrate and a jury of 12 could easily find in your favour if you convincingly argue you were trying to disable the car, which, in this instance, is reasonable.

The point is: 'England', as you put it, doesn't have a problem with cases like this. It is quite rightly decided on a case by case basis and your rants of 'serious legal trouble' is a fabrication purely from tabloid rags.

Your original post contains several inaccuracies if you read the secret Barrister link yet you have chosen double down and call everyone sheep lol.
Well it really depends doesn't it.  The driver was clearly able to leave the situation and make themselves safe, returning may be seen as vigilante style justice.  

Except what if there was family in the house, then the driver doing the ramming could argue he's protecting others.  Or he could argue he's protecting his property.

Basically maybe he would be, maybe he wouldn't, life is too complicated to reduce to simple conclusions so just enjoy it for what it is. 
Or he could argue he is affecting the prevention of crime or the perpetrators arrest. All are legal defenses in this case.
> Well it really depends doesn't it.

No, it doesn't. 
You see no need for nuance or context?  

Serious question, do you read a lot of legal cases?  Have any legal training?  Studied the outcome of similar trials?
Yes I have legal training. If you chase someone out of your house, you are already on shaky ground. Ramming into them with your car on a public road while they try to flee is an open and shut case. You are trying to bandwagon with other clueless people to downvote my comment, yet it was 100% accurate. It was +6 now it is -3. Who knows where it will end, because of hive mind idiots. Don't comment on things you don't know anything about, and especially don't try to argue with them when there so many other things you could be doing instead of wasting your time spreading misinformation. 
Nobody would sentence you if you were in actual danger. The law is in place to stop stupid shit like George Zimmerman under the stand your ground law. This is just the bollocks line from rags like the Mail/Express/Sun.
First off, you are not in danger when they are fleeing from you. You are putting yourself in danger by chasing them. They fled the home, he should have stayed there and called the police. Chasing them to get revenge or attack them is illegal. Secondly, there is no "stand your ground law" in the entire UK. Lastly, this has nothing to do with the Mail/Express/Sun. Read a real newspaper and see these stories for yourself. Also give me one reason why any part of what I said is wrong, and try to do it without ranting. 
Hey man, u right. This exact scenario is illegal everywhere in the world. 
Source: ccW in a commie state
Probably in most places. And yeah I know I'm right, people get so butthurt by the truth sometimes, especially on reddit. 
This is citizen arrest isnt it? 
Lol not even close
It could be argued but he would almost certainly lose in this case. With a citizens' arrest you still have to use "reasonable force" and also have to tell them that you are making an arrest and why. 
Uh, i get it. 

Then i prefer that castle rule thing American have. 

Even so it is out of the castle so its not for him? 
I wanted to see a couple of melons pop.
https://gfycat.com/FavoriteEnragedFrenchbulldog
(NSFW - melons pop)
I fully expected to be blue balled, but thanks for not being an asshole, sire.

Now, if you'll excuse me, I gotta perform my namesake...
NSFW
Oh my
Typical American.. ;)
I'm English and I've never seen a real gun in my entire 28 year existence, and I thought the exact same.
Even more importantly, never mess with someone who doesn't give a fuck about their life.
Having seen a demolition derby, using the back of your car is the right idea. Smashing the front end into another car can cause one of many fluids to leak. So, the pro move is to hit their nose with the front of your car.... not sure I'd do this to people with guns, though. 

Bonus video:
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=w2F4hPDhk9I
>Never mess with somebody who has FUCK YOU money.

FTFY
For real, I'm in a 98 mercury sable, fuckin test me bud.
There’s always a bigger fish
2003 salavaged civic. Absolute no fucks
Few years ago I ducked the front of my car up hitting black ice on a round about.  Car kept driving fine so I didn't get it fixed because I'm poor.


A few weeks later I'm on my way home from work and some asshole is trying to cut me off on the mass pike as we are merging. We are going maybe 10mph because of traffic.  He was in a truck, I am in my shitty little sedan.  I just keep moving.  I know he was thinking I'm in a truck so he's not going to Fuck with me.  But I had the right of way so fuck that asshole.

I just let him run right into the corner of my car.  We pulled over and he started yelling at me and I was pretty scared he was going to kick my ass but there were people everywhere.  His insurance paid to fix my car including the hood and lights and everything I had fucked up myself a few weeks earlier.  

One of the best decisions I ever made.
I’ve never heard this adage before now. Ty for the advice 
Believe it. I drive an older pickup on the freeways of LA. Oh you want to merge into me with no space? Keep coming over fucker I could care less about my paint, how you feeling about your brand new shiny Mercedes??? Yeah I thought so. 
>Never mess with somebody who doesn't give a fuck about their car.

I commute to Newark, NJ. This couldn't be more true.
Insirance baby
Edit. Winglish. 
Insurance
Doubt the insurance is going to pay after you intentionally ram your vehicle into another car. 
I just replaced a door on my car as I opened it for a motorcycle that thought he could cut through traffic. You wait just like cars do. 
Yeah except he CAN cut through traffic instead of taking up space waiting and making it slower for everyone. That and less time idling in traffic causing pollution and likely the bike is air cooled and would overheat sitting there. You gotta understand it’s not a me OR you attitude it’s a me AND you attitude and sometimes bikes are just trying to do their part in reducing traffic, not trying to inconvenience you or be better than you. Now if he’s going 80 lane splitting he’s an idiot and don’t worry will be dead soon. But bing safe and respectful when doing it, that’s a situation where it sounds like you are more of the problem than he is. Ps. If it’s not legal in your state he shouldn’t be doing it either. 
Not only are you dead wrong but you just admitted to likely a felony
The only difference being that he's in full leather gear, possibly melting in the heat with no air conditioning, while his bike is overheating because there's not enough airflow getting to the engine. So not only that, but he has to dodge pricks like you, putting solid walls in front of them.

I hope you're joking. But if you're not, that's a dick move. 
>The only difference being that he's in full leather gear, possibly melting in the heat with no air conditioning

An excellent argument against buying or riding a motorcycle, yes. Follow the rules of the road, or don't use public roadways. It's that simple. 
buddy, "cutting traffic" or lane splitting is better for all people on the road if you don't have people attempting murder like fastdrummer there https://www.wired.com/2015/06/yes-california-let-motorcycles-ride-cars/ (not the best article on the topic, but it get's the point across)
That's fucked up. Stop policing the roads and just drive your car.
If you watch the last guy come out - the one who briefly pulls the gun on the pick up truck passing by - he seems to be walking funny like he got shot on the ass.... am I just imagining that? 

He's  also the one who gets thrown like 15 feet because he's only half into the getaway car when it's first rammed. 
Everything.
No love for their fellow human beings.
3 people went in but only 2 came out. 
They stepped his dogs tail that his wife left him after she died.
“Do you like phil collins? Been a big genesis fan, ever since the release of their 1980 album, duke. Before that i didnt really understand any of their work, it was too artsy...”
It’s SA. There’s a massive crisis right now with the black population trying to eradicate all white property owners by both legal and illegal means. So theses folks probably invaded a house where the owner was waiting with a shotgun ready
This guy smashes.
The reverse slam does have a higher survivability of the engine and cooling, but the rear axle will get bent to shit if it's a hatchback or a Crossover like the one he has
He should probably get one of those flame throwing anti carjacking systems: https://youtu.be/aLhWzMOccTg 

But for his house. 
That's not a Smart ForTwo.
This car is specifically designed for ramming offensives both forward and backwards. The driver took lessons on how to properly ram the target and clearly adhered to the intruder alert plan. 
Car was totalled after the reverse, though. So why not? 


The second hit was also in reverse, dude knew what he was doing.
Did he turn around though? It kinda looks like the second ram was in reverse too (headlights still facing the other way?)

Edit: nevermind, he did turn around. 
Looks way too big to be a Fortwo (assuming you mean Smart?), and still pretty big for a Forfour (bonnet is quite long). It's probably some sort of crossover; maybe a Captur/Kuga, but either way he clearly doesn't care about what's in the front!
Why not just use a pistol? 
> not sure why he turned around to come back and probably fuck up the radiator in his badass little car.

Probably because they had a bunch of adrenaline pumping through them and weren't thinking as clearly about it as you are.
Yeah, in South Africa, whenever you want to play GTA, or any pvp, just go outside. Good graphics, but perma-death if you fuckup.
South African Police Bike Pursuit https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3n8KrdixvZc
GTA South Africa is just a plane ticket to Capetown.
Jesus GTA could be a nice band name
YOU PICKED THE WRONG HOUSE FOOL
> ute

I thought saffas called them bakkies?
I think we watched the same gif
A what?  Did you say two utes?
Thanks for the fucking explanation there guy 
https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=Hu8tX2BAD1k
American here, I’m going to start saying “tooled up” instead of “armed” now. 
Or 

Guy in house woke up and heard a noise in his toilet. "Must be an intruder" he said to his GF only to notice she wasn't next to him in the bed. So he got his gun and just before he could shoot her 4 times accidently through the bathroom door these 3 turn up see his gun and leg it.

His GF owns the same car as the would-be thieves, "There's the bitch! She's getting away" he cried as he attempted to 'accidently' hit her twice whilst parking.

The guy is extremely remorseful that some innocent and honest to goodness criminals got mixed up in his relationship woes, y'honour. 
The guy in you're story can he walk!

You're story reminds me of an upcoming lifetime movie ..
Yeah, any resemblance to any real south africans or Oscar Pistorius was entirely coincidental.
South Africa is filled with veterans. It used to be mandatory to do 2 years in the military. 

So it could have been just a veteran that you shouldn't be fucking with 
No, there was no pencil so it couldn't have been him.
Naw, there wasn't any building at all. 
They looked at his dog, man.
There was a dog inside. WAS 
Yeah, it’s wild, in the cities all homes have at least an 8 foot wall with an electric fence on top, then there is often another gate in front of doors. Of course this is not uncommon in many developing nation cities (ex. Walk around Mexico City and take a look at security systems).

When I was in Windhoek, Namibia, where they have similar security, I asked a property owner about it and he basically said it’s actually pretty safe but once one person in the neighborhood puts up a wall like that, then other people start to, then robbers only go to the homes without these systems... and all of a sudden you have to, and you can’t get your place insured (for a good rate)  without one.  Windhoek is going to be a lot safer than somewhere like Johannesburg, so the story likely doesn’t translate well to some SA places, but it is good to understand that often it’s not as bad as it looks.
Well we have to. I love living here but I ain't gonna deny it is a shithole with all the up and down sides that come with that. You take home security seriously or else you get visitors. There are about 5 gates/doors before you get into my house. The front door has been permanently sealed (wooden crossbar bolted into the wall, done by the previous occupant, not me, seems a bit silly tbh) so you can only get in through the garage. Barb wire on top of all the fencing. Burglar guards on all the windows. It doesn't need to be completely secure, just more secure than the next door neighbours. But you know what, despite all this I have never been broken into. But better take the precautions than have it happen. Because it does happen.
Been living in South Africa all my life. When I was little and saw an American movie where people lived in houses with no fences, burglar bars, barbed wire/palasade/electric fences I wondered "what the fuck is wrong with those people?? How can they be so unsafe??" Turns out the whole world is not as unsafe as it is here. 

As far as I know most other countries don't have nearly as much private security companies either. They just call the police when shit's going down. We call security because they actually respond quickly, whereas calling the police they'd take anything between 2-4 hours to show up - if they even show up at all. Almost every neighborhood here has at least 1 company patrolling the streets doing the job the police should be doing. 

Or just get a scary-ass dog such as a bull-terrior to keep dem baddies away. If they don't poison the dog to break in they kinda avoid your house then.
My friend and I had to spend roughly 10 hours in Johannesburg. Our friend Mikhail found a kamikaze driver to take us on a tour through the city center. We, the two retards, thought that they were exaggerating about the danger just to frighten us. We thought that we’d get to the center, take a long good stroll through it and show everyone that Russians aren’t afraid of anything.

We ended up not even coming close to doing any of these things.

The reason?

We nearly shat ourselves.

The descent to Johannesburg from the plateau made the city look great. Beautiful, big, modern. Some skyscrapers here and there, some nice Victorian-style buildings. Green lawns, blue sky.

Upon actually entering the city, the picture changed drastically.

It looked completely abandoned.

There was no electricity.

Prior to riding into the city, the driver appointed by Mikhail read us a short “do’s and don’ts” lecture. He seemed very tense, gulping often and suspiciously looking around as he spoke:

“If you cunts want to survive this, do exactly as I say.

After we enter the city, NO LOUD NOISES, do not ATTRACT ANY ATTENTION!

NO FUCKING IPHONES OR CAMERAS flashing through the car windows!

DO NOT MAKE EYE CONTACT with ghouls! (that’s what he called blacks)

And no matter what happens, DO NOT OPEN THE WINDOWS!

Because suddenly a lamp post can fall and block the way, and the ghouls will fucking siege us.

And remember that I have kids, so at least follow these rules for my sake…”

We spent two hours riding around the city center.

It was quiet enough in the bus to hear a pin drop.

To understand what happened to the city, a small historical flashback is needed.

After the apartheid was over, a two-million swarm of Africans flooded the city, opening the era of African Reconquista. They were not natives, they just left their usual places in the desert and went wherever life was better. Mikhail, the guy who got us the driver, lived in Johannesburg at that time and told us the following:

In the middle of an ordinary workday, something happened.

The office center’s doors opened and an unorganized crowd of several thousand blacks rushed in, carrying their belongings in huge bags. They asked us not to pay any attention to them and continue working, while they were spreading around the building and occupying every bit of territory that was available. Armchairs, stools, sofas, restrooms and hallways – they were everywhere, happily chatting and wasting no time in taking whatever shiny things the building’s original denizens had on them.

The office became filled with commotion. Chickens were butchered and gutted in the hallways, tables in audience rooms turned into cooking tables, restrooms became bathhouses.

The polite question “What’s going on?” was answered with “This is our home now.”

The subsequent, less polite question “What the fuck?!” met a reply “It will be better for everyone.”

Mikhail called the cops.

Cops didn’t come.

They apologized and explained that exactly the same thing was happening cross the entire city.

Then, everyone who could started to quietly flee the city, headed towards the suburbs and Cape Town, while erecting barriers to block the paths – hedges, moats, electrified fences. The last district of Johannesburg where you can meet a white man nowadays is the Pretoria suburb.

After a massive exodus, the owners of the buildings started thinking of what to do.

Bingo! They decided that if they switch off the electricity, water and sewer access to the buildings, the ghouls will leave them and return to the savannah.

So, they switched them off.

Ghouls didn’t even notice.

Of course, in the Savannah they had neither of these modern conveniences. “Where do they shit, then?” I asked Mikhail.

Mikhail replied that the office owners were also puzzled by this – and completely shocked after they found out.

You see, after invading the buildings, none of the ghouls could figure out what elevator shafts were for. Once they ripped out the elevator doors, they spent a few days scratching heads and spitting into the darkness, until it finally occurred to them.

“White people are geniuses when it comes to planning,” thought the ghouls, and the shafts became both toilets and garbage dumps ever since. According to Mikhail, it takes roughly ten years for an average ghoul horde to shit up an office building to the point of complete unliveability. After that, like in good old prehistoric times, the horde migrates to new pastures, occupying another building.

We rode on through Johannesburg’s streets, glued to the car windows, devouring the scenery with our eyes. Fashionable modern houses with boarded-up windows passed us by. When we came across a rare open window, we could see fires burning inside, with ghouls lying or walking around them.

(Once again) According to Mikhail, a new, albeit informal service appeared in Johannesburg. Bunches of tough guys go around offering to take the buildings back from ghouls. It happens like this: in the middle of the night several trucks drive up to the building, and one or two hundred armed thugs go inside. Quickly, they grab the sleeping ghouls and simply start throwing them out of the building, trying not to wake the whole horde up. Before the horde completely comes to its senses and starts expressing its displeasure, the thugs weld shut all doors and windows on the first floor and put up an electrified fence. After the building is cleaned and refurbished, it turns back into an office.

That’s how the remnants of Johannesburg’s white population live and work. In the evening and during the night they keep safe behind armored doors and private guards. In the morning they get into their cars and quickly, without stopping, ride outside their fortresses to work. After a short ride through more-or-less safe streets, they dive into one of the heavily guarded foxholes that leads to the underground parking garages. And that concludes their arrival to the workplace.

Another funny thing I noticed – if two “live” buildings are nearby, they are often connected by an aerial passage at the 10th or 11th floor. So office workers can even visit each other if they want to. The only trick to it is not to look down. Down there is ghoul territory.

I'm so shocked to see nazi scum on a thread about South Africa.
The people you call Nazis hold the same opinions that [American WW2 GIs held](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Racism_against_African_Americans_in_the_U.S._military#World_War_II). You know, those people that fought *against* the Nazis.
Pretty much everyone with brains has already left South Africa. 

I live in Perth and there are heaps of highly skilled South African immigrants here who left because of rampant crime and corruption, and the government is still doing its best to run the country into the ground. 

They will be as divided as Zimbabwe in a decade or less. 
Is there any African country that has its shit together? 
Sounds like a shithole
Unlike Charlize, who is very involved in her country
That's because, in the words of Jim Jeffries: "South Africa's fucked."
Absolute nonsense. 
I've seen Chappie once, so that pretty much makes me an expert: South Africa is Thunderdome. 
No that is not why you move fuckhead.
Musk is a grade a cunt, you can have him and his fondness for government cheese.
Alright deal, we get Musk and you get to keep all the crime and AIDS
Holy shit ¯\\\_(ツ)\_/¯
/r/murderedbywords
That's a fucking low bar for "murdered by words". 

You can keep musk and all the school shootings and kids murdering each other and sjw's. We will keep the beautiful country and amazing animals and amazing mix of cultures"

Lol murdered by words dude /s
Mad that he didn't stay so the SA government could appropriate all of his wealth and resources, huh?
He didn't stay because he got bullied. Nothing to do with the government 
But that's not why Seth here is upset about it.
I'm so glad he hasn't got to Britain yet
Reddit's not gonna like this! But I have to agree ;) 
NO CAPES
Sometimes I like to daily carry my PT Cruiser for situations just like this
underrated comment. LOL.
What a shithole
happens more in america.  americans represent 25% of the world's prison population.
No it doesn't. Not only are many people in the US convicted for petty crimes, SA would have far more serious criminals in prison if their justice system and police forces worked and could catch them. There are far too few SA prisons and they're doubly overcrowded. 
[deleted]
Yeah there's white people in South Africa too, what's your point?
What does their skin colour have to do with it?
Spend a few days in South Africa... you will quickly realize race has everything to do with it.  

The SA parliament just passed legislation legalizing the forcible seizure of property from White farmers with lethal force if necessary.  Only the White farmers though... so it’s ok.  You think The Purge is just a movie? 

Majority of Americans live in a self-absorbed bubble.  Have no idea what is happening outside their materialistic, consumption driven, entertainment obsessed world of smoke and mirrors. 
Color has nothing to do with this. As a white South African citizen, stop your shit . There's no white genocide in South Africa. 
It's this weird thing that when stuff out of South Africa starts climbing the front page, that this weird "white" agenda starts appearing in the comments. Some of it I can usually dismiss as racist saffa's wanting to throw shit at the wall, but there are times where I get this weird feeling that we're attracting some organised international flavour that's hell bent on pushing this odd "white genocide' thing.
Yeah, South Africa seems to be a beloved topic for white nationalists. I often see the white genocide myth perpetuated by white nationalists on Reddit, even non-South Africans, as a means to show why their Nazi views are justified. I think it's mainly because if anyone searches for white genocide in SA on Google, they're going to find enough legit looking sources to convince them.
South Africa and Zimbabwe 
Err if there's enough legit sources to convince the average person that there's a white genocide emerging in South Africa, maybe SA genocide is something to be concerned about? Just saying.
Care to share any of these "legit" sources? Since there's apparently so many.
Ask /u/Zoopyguy, the person to whom I was responding.
He used the term legit looking. Not legit sources, just ones that appear to be.
I said legit looking, not legit. Many of them do appear legit until you start looking at the bigger picture, like overall crime statistics for the entire country. That's when you realise that the white genocide myth doesn't match reality at all and exists mainly in the heads of people who never moved on from Apartheid. Like our friend, fascistx, who posts on the National Socialist (iow Nazi) subreddit.

South Africa has a lot of problems, but the idea that white genocide is happening is ridiculous. 
It isn't South Africa it is any discussion that is even remotely related to race or nationality.

Basically reddit is absolutely full of vile little Nazis, a lot of subs are moderated by vile little Nazis and Reddit appears to be encouraging it. That's the issue
What a load of absolute horseshit. As a saffa that's far so fucking incorrect I don't even know where to start.

Care to share some of your bullshit sources for the fact that Parliament has passed legislation to only seize white farmers farms?

Also what's with the random capitalization of White?


I feel your rage, bro. That redditor is only right about one thing: us Americans have little to no idea what things are like in SA. I mean, the most I've learned about SA is from Die Antwoord and CHAPPiE. You should make a post setting the record straight.
I don't feel the need to try and educate someone like that who has already made up their mind. If that person actually read the news in this country, they'd know its not true, and me pointing to the various articles discussing whats actually going on wouldn't be read, cos its about feels not reals.

But to clarify for anyone reading this - the ANC ( the party that makes up the majority in parliament) has been talking about taking land without fair compensation. Now there's a couple of hurdles in their way. They'd need to change the constitution ( which is pretty difficult for them, but not out right impossible if other parties join them), but they're aware of what that would do to the economy, and the ANC's big problem at the moment is they need to pay a lot of people to keep everyone happy. Ie lots of corruption going on. With fuck all economy there's no money and then no support.

 On top of that from the discussions that have come out - they seem to be leaning towards legislation that would take land that is not being used, has been bought for commercial purpose and neglected, and a couple of other things along those lines. Now this might not be fair, but its incredibly far away from what that dumbass up there said. Its not aimed at white farmers and it for fucking sure has not been passed through any form of legislation. We're years away from that at this point.

To sum up - the ANC is making populist rumblings to shore up their support that the EFF has eroded. No legislation has been passed and it's not aimed at white people ( Beyond the fact that white people own the majority of the economy. )

> We're years away from that at this point.

And the next thing you know, you're there. 
And if pigs had wings then they'd know how to fly. What's your point?
The point is, 'years away' means nothing more than 'this will happen before we know it.' 
["The country's constitution is now likely to be amended to allow for the confiscation of white-owned land without compensation, following a motion brought by radical Marxist opposition leader Julius Malema.](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-5443599/White-South-African-farmers-removed-land.html)

[It passed by 241 votes for to 83 against after a vote on Tuesday, and the policy was a key factor in new president Cyril Ramaphosa's platform after he took over from Jacob Zuma in February."](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-5443599/White-South-African-farmers-removed-land.html)
Gee the daily mail. There's a source for unbiased nuanced reporting.
Would the taking of unused land violate the constitution in the same regard as the above measure?


And what part of your constitution does the former measure break? Discriminating based on race?
Yes. The right to own your property and to receive appropriate compensation if the state needs to appropriate that property is part of the constitution. There is no distinction between used/unused, if you own it they must pay for it.

The proposed changes would need a constitutional change that requires a 2 thirds majority vote, which is possible if all the cards fall in their favor.
Thanks for the reply. 
Justifying genocide: the post.

["The country's constitution is now likely to be amended to allow for the confiscation of white-owned land without compensation, following a motion brought by radical Marxist opposition leader Julius Malema.](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-5443599/White-South-African-farmers-removed-land.html)

[It passed by 241 votes for to 83 against after a vote on Tuesday, and the policy was a key factor in new president Cyril Ramaphosa's platform after he took over from Jacob Zuma in February."](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-5443599/White-South-African-farmers-removed-land.html)
Gee the daily mail. There's a source for unbiased nuanced reporting.

So wait, the vote didn't pass 241 to 83?
The motion passed. So whats your point?
Quick question, is SA a fair country to move to or am I better off in the US?
Entirely depends. If you earn dollars or are well off you'd have an incredibly high standard of living here ( depending what city you're in) SA is a great place to live. It has it's issues. Our political situation is complicated and interesting, but we seem to be on our way forward with a new president after the last fuck up.

Crime is always an issue, with the stats being horrendous, but this is pretty much because of so much crime in the poor, black areas due to the inequality in the country. That's not to say it doesn't affect more well off people cos it does, but no where near the same as poor areas.

I love South Africa, and  most of the foreign people I meet here love it as well ( particularly when you have a favourable exchange rate.)

I'd say come out and visit and check the country out before considering moving here (that goes for any country tbh) 

I think at the end of the day a lot of people have this weird agenda with regards to us because of Apartheid and whats going on now.

This country has a lot to answer for, and there's a ton of work to still do. But the politics in this country are not it's people. And South African's are awesome.

Aren’t you guys about to run out of water?
Cape Town, not the country luckily (although we the whole southern tip of Africa is a water scarce area. Although from recent reports it seems like they've dodged a bullet for now, but it will entirely depend on the upcoming winter rains there.
>	If you earn dollars or are well off you'd have an incredibly high standard of living here

Most middle class North Americans have a higher standard of living than you see in SA when performing a middle class job. This is a common misconception among South Africans. Skilled workers are paid well in the US and Canada, we’re talking plumbers, carpenters, welders etc.

>	Crime is always an issue, with the stats being horrendous, but this is pretty much because of so much crime in the poor, black areas due to the inequality in the country. That's not to say it doesn't affect more well off people cos it does, but no where near the same as poor areas.

This is true, but the crime affects everyone in **how** they go about living their lives. You can’t walk home from the pub after a night binge drinking, and every time you leave the house you need to be preventatively defensive in your actions. After we left, it was incredible how free it felt to just do everyday stuff without constantly looking out for suspect behavior.

>	But the politics in this country are not it's people. And South African's are awesome.

Can’t agree more, love to come back to visit, but I can’t see how I wil ever move back.

P.S. I live in Canada now
Is this a joke? Dude you live in the most prosperous nation on earth, it’s not without its problems but I can think of 50 other countries I’d move to before South Africa.

People are getting the fuck out of South Africa, there is a huge amount of crime and random violence. A city like Chicago has high crime but 95% of it is gang on gang crime. As someone who isn’t part of that circle you don’t have to worry about getting raped and slaughtered in your bed, or having someone just shoot you for your iPhone. Life is very very cheap in South Africa.

Beautiful place to visit on vacation, but to consider leaving the states to move there? Honestly it’s crazy.
As someone who left South Africa for reasons other than crime, I would say definitely not.

When I left SA it was to live in another country and experience some other cultures. Yes, crime was big issue but it was not a driving force in our decision to emigrate.

Once we got out, we realized just how badly crime impacts on your daily life is SA. I was never robbed or in a seriously dangerous situation in SA, but you don’t leave your house without being defensive.

So, South Africa is a great place to visit. Absolutely beautiful and you’re unlikely to get into trouble. But I would never move back there.

P.S. You North Americans (both the US and Canada) have no idea how good you have it. You complain about gun control ans snowflakes and libtards and the cost of medicine and how the world is such a shithole these days. The facts are that 99% of you are better off than the person in Africa that sits on the same rung of the social ladder. Middle class US is way ahead of middle class in Africa, and the poor in Africa don’t have food stamps, they beg and steal to get by.
Yes you should move to SA but only if you believe diversity is a good thing.
[removed]
> Jo’berg

Joburg*
Care to share an article - or keep talking bullshit?

Cos here's a hint. Passing a motion in Parliament is not the same as legislating it.

But I wouldn't have expected some one who's clearly trying to push a weird white racial agenda to actually understand that.

Also for fucks sakes man - you're not even South African (Jo'berg? Jesus) So what fucking horse do you have in this race?
Reddit is absolutely festering with Nazis and racists. A lot of subs are moderated by Nazis. The question is why does Reddit appear to be supporting it?
Where are all of these Nazis on Reddit?  I don't give a crap about South Africa - I know too little about it to say anything that didn't end in a question mark.

But I hear this simple/undeveloped-brain comment about Nazis all the time.  Are people using a new definition of that word or something?


https://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/africa/south-africa-white-farms-land-seizure-anc-race-relations-a8234461.html

As you say it is a motion but it does say for instance "South Africa's new president, Cyril Ramaphosa, said he would speed up the transfer of land from white to black owners after his inauguration two weeks ago". The man who put forward the motion is known for quotes like "Go After A White Man... We Are Cutting The Throat Of Whiteness".

So it does seem to me (although I admiteddly have only just now started to look into this) like your statement of "Its not aimed at white farmers" is completely incorrect. 
What the EFF says is and does is basically moot. They don't have enough votes or power to get anything done.

What they do have is the fact that they're bleeding the ANC of votes. So of course the ANC is going to try and use the same populist rhetoric with a national election happening next year. Only difference is they're running the country so they know how to temper expectations.

Here's a decent article that covers how the ANC is possibly looking at doing it. Still has the populist message, but none of the unhinged rants of the EFF. 

https://m.huffingtonpost.co.za/2018/03/28/anc-floats-new-deal-on-land-expropriation-without-compensation_a_23397146/ 

I don't know, according to Wikipedia the EFF is the third-largest party and their motion got passed by an overwhelming majority.

Anyway I was just pointing out that your statement that this has nothing to do with race is incorrect, it seems to have a lot to do with it. 
I have no dog in this fight and have never been to SA.  But there are literally hundreds of articles from news outlets all around the world stating the South African Parliament has passed this legislation.   Are they all incorrect? 
Then share one since there have been hundreds

Right-wing propaganda is pushing that shit out, and there's no shortage of morons at the trough 
Are you the same commenter as above?
alright calm down guy. so what exactly does happen outside the *bubble*
Whoa, here is barely a shred of truth to anything you just said. 
Lol... you poor thing.   What happened to your brain to make it so stupid?   What an asinine,  generic statement.   It always comes back to something us Americans have or haven't done,  right?   

The sooner people realize America does, b indeed,  sympathize with the world's plight,  but that only they can truly fix their issues,  the sooner idiots like you can stop pointing fingers. 
I asked that on the BLM forum but got downvotes by a horde of Russian bots.
Same could happen in South Africa. If you aren't acting in self defence and can't prove that your life was in danger you could be charged for attempted murder here too. 
> Thank God this is South Africa.

Said nobody ever.
Fucking Canada. I feel you bro. 
Imagine believing this lol 
in America. 
Yeah, so not a really good decision. 
Yeah if you have the opportunity to remove yourself from danger but choose to come back?  That's a paddlin
Ya,  that is fucking hilarious
Eeeh.. also difficult to prove
I thought that was Tsavo?
Bru, some South Africans are so dramatic. Our country isnt thaat bad 
Adrenaline, panic, stupid to start off with.
Driver didn’t make it back out. 
The car is right hand drive, I think a driver was inside all the time. 
Because they are dumb
There were 3, 2 went in but only 1 came out by the looks of it? Not sure because of the cut. Maybe the last guy was the driver.
fuck yoooou!  

*SMASH*

Bread, milk, oranges.  I feel like I'm forgetting something.
Yo what the fuck
What in the actual fuck are you on about.
Can't really speak to the accuracy of this, never been, but damn if I'm not impressed by the effort and how well it kept me interested. You really ought to write a book.
It’s a goddamn gold mine Charlie!
Rainbow nation my ass.
I met some South Africans in Florida. There was a mix of white, black, and even aboriginals. They were all the best people on Earth. I can't imagine a cooler group of people. I even got to learn a little of a language where you inhale for some sounds. It was a cool experience and they were great people. Poor people suck everywhere, when you're desperate, you're willing to do some weird things to survive, or help your family survive. That being said, I was laughing quite a bit at this video 
>South Africans

#

>Aboriginals
Believe it or not, they have more than two types of people.
>slɐuᴉƃᴉɹoq∀
You do know that there are aboriginals outside of Australia right? 
R.I.P
Yes! I wondered, why no one else noticed 
Three left the car at the start, the duo (gunman and guy with light short pants) and the solo guy (long light pants). LLP is seen running back first, and the around 21 seconds in it cuts to the duo walking back to the car, where the gun-cunt decided to aim his tool at the car passing by.
Seems more like Jason Statham.
Same here 
Drivel. South Africans kill everyone black or white as a matter of a fact they kill more blacks than white. I saw on news when they lit up a bus with Zimbabweans etc. South Africans are downright shit.
It's not a genocide, don't be dramatic. It's appalling and deserves widespread condemnation but exaggerating it only makes you look foolish.
You didn't reply to me, but I'm guessing you're not too informed on how the parliamentary system works?

Passing a motion =/= legislation. 

Basically what happened is a political party said we should do x, another one joined in and agreed. So maybe at some point it will happen, but it hasn't been voted on and nothing is legislated in law.

At this point it's populist rumblings. We've got an election next year and the ANC has been losing voters.

I'm not saying it won't happen. But its not legislation like the original OP stated.
All African countries are shitholes
What goes around comes around 
you...you crazy, man
Even better tip: move.
What does this have to do with snakes?
I highly doubt the channel that you are referencing would recommend the home owners actions by using that catchphrase.
You're an underrated genius.
https://www.wikihow.com/Overcome-Insecurity
I think he picked the right car fool. 
It's free real estate. 
A surprise to be sure, but a welcome one.
Actually, I farted...
I love the smell of new gif in the morning
Can you smell the neu smell traveling through the air?

Aye, I can lad, It's-a comin from ova there
That smell. A kind of smelly smell. A smelly smell that smells...smelly. 
WE EATIN TONIGHT BOYS
I love the smell of a new gif in the morning. It smells like... I don’t know... victory.
This is rare on Reddit nowadays
Starting 22.04.2018
Wonder if reddit will be around then.
In 2026, it was a stepped-on recompressed version with a watermark. Over the decades it got worse, and worse, until the original video file suddenly appeared on the auction market, and was snapped up for a cool $5,000. 

You see, by the end of the 21st century, original versions of historical video files were starting to get scarce. Whatever 9GAG had been, historians now cursed how it defaced a million unique videos, while keeping their fingers crossed that someday the original would be located on a still-functional SD card.
!remindme 7 years
Reposter: "I wouldn't let these assholes get away with trying to rob me! AMA April 21, 2026" 
Stunning analysis from /u/TheGamecock here. 
I thought the robber’s car was near a cliff and the guy was going to ram them over it
I was rooting for a good pull forward and back up again tbh and got sad when I saw him speed off. I was thinking he just didn't want to get shot then I saw head lights coming back into the picture and smiled.
Why would drive away from your house afte- oh.
yes, this was indeed the best part
The is the trailer for John wick three

That part had me going holy shittt get em!
Yes that's what the commenter you replied to liked too...
I felt the most satisfied when you see the robber get clipped and knocked over on the first ram. So. Good.
/r/gifsthatkeepongiving 
Rule number two. Got to get the double tap.
I actually gasped! And now my dog is looking at me like something’s gonna happen...
This being South Africa, I was kinda expecting flame thrower.
pretty sure thats illegal
So is robbery
Your honor ... so is ROBBERY!

Case dismissed! 
yeah, those guys are going to jail.

i dont want to go to jail.
I don’t know about South Africa, but shooting armed robbers in your house at night is 100% legal in Ohio.  It’s called the Castle Doctrine.
Bruh, that is literally everywhere in america. Some sailor in Hawaii was drunk N killed like yesterday cause he went to the wrong house 
The car ramming part may still be illegal, but if it was just a fire fight at the house the owner would almost certainly be fine.
That would be the least of South Africa’s worries 
How pissed do you have to be to wreck the front and back end of your own car?
You're supposed to back into other cars when ramming to avoid damaging your engine/radiator and risk getting stuck. Otherwise, cool.
A Tiger? In Africa!?

https://youtu.be/oLdk2C25Z14
I was secretly hoping for hyenas. That would be funny. 
Would be strange since there is no wild tigers in South Africa
Can it be because of the movie 'The Hangover', where the group steals a tiger?
You think this is Florida ,Joe exotic
I was too
There is no sound in/of this video.
Yooooh, bliksem.
They shot into the pickup truck! I think the gunfire is what prompted the owner to attack with their vehicle.

^(`edit, 20 min later:` Word order.)
God damnit.
^(can't bamboozle me when i have thumbnails on all links sucka)
Der betreffende Nutzer hat das Video in deinem Land nicht zur Verfügung gestellt.
Beautiful
Oh no you don't 
HECK
Was quite suspicious when a link to a sub had an RES preview button..
Bitch 
I deserve it...
Touché 
Damn you
You Win! I have no regrets.
Is it really a bamboozle if I'm happy it happened?
This doesn’t work using /r/Apollo for Reddit app. I can see the thumbnail. 
I went 3 years without getting rickrolled, and now it happend for the 6th time in just one week...
Damn you
When you have nothing to lose, you have everything to gain.
Yeah don't fuck with me
Why would anyone?
That's why the Romans never truly took over England
 Ut the person is messing with the robbers who clearly dont give a crap about their lives. I'm happy he messed with them. Hope they didnt get away.
Yeah maybe we should stop pissing off suicide bombers
Good thing r/incels was banned then. 
unless you in a car with rear engine. 
Cars can get real fucked up from even very slow front end collisions. Some will take a while to prevent your car from running, but still very easy to do major damage.
This is horrible advice, your gas tank is in the rear. 
While that is true its in the rear, the rear-end is engineered with this in mind. Long ago getting rear ended could mean fireball. That doesn't really happen these days because they fixed that. 

TL:DR Fuel tank is more protected than the engine.
>>Never mess with somebody who has NO, FUCK *YOU* money.
>
>FTFTFY


And what's the point of having fuck you money if you never say fuck you?
I don't have fuck you money, but I do have the money to replace my car with a similiar car and not care about it :) 
Maybe he crapped his pants in the excitement?
I thought this was like that time two guys tried to rob a gay sex offender and get raped. 
Did he fire a ~~shit~~ *shot* at the other car? It looks like it but I’m not an expert on guns at all 
I actually thought the same thing. I took it as that or a slight panicked hesitancy, thinking of like "what the fuck should I do?"
I’m guessing his pants were too low and he didn’t have a belt. 
I assumed a dog chewed on it a bit, couldn't tell.
He’s running around like his pants are too goddamn tight 
It looks to me like all three of them are already walking/running funny at the beginning, with oddly short steps.
I thought for a second he was pulling his pants down to moon the person they were robbing 
Actually my first though was that he got a good old spanking 
For 3 armed men to run away from an unarmed man is hardly believable, you're probably right.  I'm guessing home owner shot at them, they ran, he mashes their car lol
In the video, you can see a muzzle flash when he fires the gun into the passing truck
He doesn't just pull he fires at the driver. Muzzle flashes around 29.7
I was thinking the same. Something painful definitely happened to him off screen. And why pull a gun on the passing car when you've got a perfectly good getaway car at hand? Was he panicking?
I’m gonna go on a limb and say that after getting shot, even if it’s in the ass, robbing an *additional* person would be the last thing on your mind. 
I thought he was pointing the gun at him in a "keep driving" sort of gesture 
I doubt he got shot.  Guns are very illegal in SA, to even own a hunting rifle you need all sorts of paperwork.  So unless they were trying to rob another criminal I doubt he was armed.
Guns are not illegal at all in South Africa, but they do have sensible gun laws. You need to take a gun safety course and prove that you are proficient at handling it, and have no criminal history. This applies to handguns and rifles.

Among the poor, the cost is a hurdle, so legal gun ownership is less common.

Among the middle and upper class, you will find handguns in around 1 in 4 homes, based on personal experience (my family isn’t big on gun ownership). I’m not sure what the official numbers are, but this person was likely armed.
But he didn do nufin!
Hes definitely injured 
All the wrong 
I think 3 came out. The video just cuts between guy 1 coming out and guys 2 and 3 coming out together. 
Then you need either a gynecologist or a proctologist.  
^^Ok ^^pedants, ^^could ^^be ^^a ^^trip ^^to ^^ENT
Welcome to the thunderdome
Nah three get out. When it cuts to the two people leaving, one gets in the back seat door on the left, while the other tries to get into the backseat door on the right, only to see there is someone already there.
Only 2 entered. The 3rd guy never went in and turned around after the clip cuts. Then the other 2 came out. Nobody stayed behind.

Why does everyone have such a hard time seeing things correctly in videos? If there's one thing I've learned from reddit, it's that eye witnesses are horrible, even when they have the chance to see it over and over again.
Demolition derbies are always a bunch of dudes backing into each other.
If it's front wheel drive it may not even have a rear axle. Donno what kind of car that is though 
I feel scaring someone pointing a gun at you that they probably have there finger on the trigger could go horribly wrong for you. 
Or a Marauder.
I am disappointed that this is not stick death dot com
Sorry Postie. False alarm again. 
Does insurance cover righteous retribution?
Haven't you ever been to a demolition derby?! You can run a car backwards into another one for a surprisingly long time.
Just buy the dlc that comes with all the gear including a flame throwing car.
You don't even have to go outside, it'll come to you if you live in a nice house.
/r/outside
If you're black in SA it's basically GTA, everything for the taking. 
Jaden Smith: maybe when you play GTA you’re playing with real people?
“WASTED!”
Fucking Badass
[deleted]
I am going to say that this is a bit closer to common place when you have a cord attached to your gun. 
Should be on BMWs marketing strategy
Why does the street say STOP in English?
Almost all roadsigns in SA are in English or Afrikaans, and 'stop' is the same in both languages
Woodstock
They also don't really call each other saffas unless they're in another country that calls them that. So /u/AccomplishedWall is probably Australian.
We do...
Incredible 
Haven’t seen a My Cousin Vinny reference in quite some time. 
Prob Australian 
Pardon me, Your Honor.  Two yewwwthzz.
You’re welcome. I trust you’ll carry the sunny disposition it gave you all the way to the house to get your shine box. 
A foookkkiiinnnn pinciillll!! 
Thank you for explaining this so well! I've been in some areas of Mexico that looked like this (concrete walls with broken glass jaggedly inset at the top etc) but on all other accounts were relatively safe family neighborhoods and it always confused me as the only places in the U.S. that look like that are normally really unsafe places
Yep that is pretty much word for word what I've been told by a lot of people 
A country can either choose to put it's criminals in cages or regular people will be forced to live in cages.
From my trip I realized the same thing. Security companies must be earning a bomb there. There were so many homes with electric barbed wire on their boundary walls even in places that looked safe.
I’m sure they are.

If you haven’t seen this yet, Louis Theroux has 48 minute documentary on private security companies in South Africa, it’s pretty eye opening:

https://documentaryvine.com/video/louis-theroux-law-and-disorder-in-johannesburg/
Where do you live where you have to take security so seriously? Is there anywhere in the country that is safe? When did things start to get so bad?
I live in a poorer area just outside the city center before the suburbs though. I could afford a better area but I like it here. There are lots of places that are safe. Gated communities are generally pretty good. Basically there is a wall around a bunch of houses sometimes up to like 100 houses. Normally there are guards patrolling. I used to live in one but honestly it is to much of a hassle for me. But no denying it was safer. Good place to raise kids (but in my experience they can be kinda racist) because you can just let them out and as long as they stay in the gated community they will be fine. There are normally rules (think a HOA in the US. The one I lived in all the houses had to be the same colour, you had to have a white picket fence etc. plus a whole lot of random annoyances.)

No denying after Apartheid ended thats when crime got bad for us white people. I don't know for sure because I havent looked at old crime stats but my feeling it has always been bad for the black people here. But Apartheid was obviously something that had to end. Honestly my feeling crime has only been getting less and less over the years. The country is getting nicer and nicer. I see people on reddit talking shit about the place and yeah its not the best place in the world but shit does feel like it is improving here slowly. Just bare in mind you see a lot of people talking aboiut a white genocide or whatever. It is complete BS. Crime in the poorer (read black) areas is far far far worse than in the richer (read as white) areas. Those black and white distinctions are getting more and more mixed though.
Do you have any kind of exit plan, if shit gets really bad, and they do start targeting whites on a larger scale? I've heard Cape Town is beautiful, at least parts of it, in terms of natural scenery, but there has been such an explosion in population that there could soon be a real shortage of safe water.
I don't think that will happen. They are people angry enough for it but for the most part I don't think anywhere close to majority want that. There is a political party called the EFF who pander to that sort and they get like 5% of the vote. But in terms of if it did happen, well not really. I mean I have the money to leave and I would asap if it looked to me like it was heading that way but each year that passes it is less likely to happen. Politicians are gonna be politicians and pander but they have money if they do that they lose their money. We aren't a dictatorship like Zimbabwe was. It just isn't very likely. Thety want to discuss land reform without compensation, my feeling it is mostly just a smoke screen to pander and not something that will actually happen. They know it is agaist the constitution so they wont actually have to do it. They don't have the votes to change the constitution so they will say we want to so vote for us and not the EFF. WHich admittedly is a dangers thing but yeah.
Thanks. What is it that you love about SA? The people, your co-workers? The land? Having to live behind a wall and so many gates and doors sounds kind of crazy. Do neighbors ever hang out?
South Africans are amazing people. Very friendly, outgoing and all that.

The country itself is beautiful.

The infrastructure is good (but not great).

Decent standard of living for middle & upper class, the poor suffer greatly.

All of the above applies to white, black and all other races.
> scary ass-dog

***

^(Bleep-bloop, I'm a bot. This comment was inspired by )^[xkcd#37](https://xkcd.com/37)
thank god they denuclearized. 
Last time I saw SA passed a law to grab land from whites without compensation. How is that going?
You're wrong, with that sort of encompassing statement about anyone having brains having left and all, but I hear you. 

I left to continue studies and opportunities in Edinburgh. Throughout my life I have never witnessed or experienced this "rampant crime" and I firmly believe that people tend to twist the truth to make themselves feel better about leaving there birthplace and home. It's really not that bad. 

The country needs help, skill, good people, and much much more. But it still has some of the best weather, kindest people, and most incredible nature in the world. 

Things are changing there, and I have my hopes up at the moment. What with the infamous Jacob Zuma stepping down, things could change :)
Same bot here man.
Everyone with money. 

I live in Canada but my entire family still lives in SA. They don't have any money to immigrate. 

Just the reality 
But the fatty boom booms! 
Do you know what politics that goverment has? Left leaning, right leaning, anti capitalist? 
There's still a ton of experienced, skilled and intelligent  people in SA that have no intention of leaving. That's despite the fact that most (but not all of them) have the means to do so. It can be an uphill battle to live happily in SA, no matter what your background is, but the rich culture and amazing natural resources make it a great place to live and raise your children in.

Your generalisation that all intelligent people have left the country is ignorant at best, and an insult to the ones that are still living in SA and loving it. 
> I live in Perth

There it is. Where all the racist South Africans have moved to
TIL wanting to leave a country with one of the highest crime rates in the world makes one a racist.
No. But bleeting on about how much you hate my country years after you left is. Now shut he fuck up racist. 
I'm not from South Africa and I've never been there. My comments are only based on what my friends who live in Perth have said about it; and they all say pretty much the same thing.

If a country has rampant crime then you can't blame people for leaving if they have the means to do so, especially people with young families.

The only racism worth talking about is the SA government openly saying shit about removing white people from farms that their families have run for generations. That's fucked up, and burying your head in the sand won't change that. 
Your friends are a bunch of racists. There are lots of white South Africans who *want* to be South African, shoulder to shoulder with their black countrymen, and who are not longing for the good old days of apartheid where everything was 'better'. Get to know your friends a bit better. They're racists. I can guarantee it.
My original comment had nothing to do with race. You're making it about race, not me.

If I'm a victim of crime I couldn't give a flying fuck what colour skin the criminal cunts have. 
Just stay there. We are doing just fine without assholes like you.
Botswana, Namibia. And even though it has its problems, South Africa is like the economic and industrial hub for Africa and is doing pretty well compared to most of the continent. It depends on region too, Cape Town might as well be Europe, whereas downtown Port Elizabeth can be a bit bleak, as an example.  
Nigeria, well I mean for Africa.
Morocco is the only African country I would consider moving to. To Rabat or Casa probably. 
Rwanda is pretty nice. I could live there for a little while. Kigali doesn't feel like most cities in Africa. I would move there before a lot of cities in the US honestly. That's is if it didn't put me a 14 hour flight away from my family.
Yes. South Africa. What is wrong with you. 
Tfw more than double the reported rapes of a country 42x your size (India)
Tfw Indians massively underreport rape... 
Was just down there and had a great time, really beautiful country.
it's all relative, there are safe people in south africa and endangered people in america and vice versa
It's actually not, it's a beautiful place that has a terrible divide between the middle and lower class. Poor people have been marginalized by political corruption and have no hope of evergetting out of their current situation. It's really sad and will take a long time to repair. 
Please stay away from my country.  Its wonderful here without you. 
Yep, it is. And they didnt even hit the bottom yet. Give them 10 years to drive away / kill white population and it will turn into zimbabwe 2.0
Just ask ou Oscartjie.
He was sarcastic my China or don't you get it
Dude had a gun. Pretty sure you could say you were scared for your life no?
Isn't this the same place where a cop pulls you over for "speeding" and says "I need to eat bro" so you give him a little money and are on your way?

For this I would just offer them a nice steak dinner and unlimited drinks. Seems fair.
Yeah that happens. 
Perpetrators were white so no one would give a shit. 
Tell that to Oscar Pistorius
Said it this morning, actually. 
Seriously.  If you hate your country so much (assuming US) you could immigrate to S. Africa.
Maybe if someone who thought they were in Zimbabwe or some shit were actually in South Africa? That’s gotta be a little better.
I think Evian loves the place
Except most every other African country.
Uuuh a farmer just shot a teenage in the back of the head at point blank range, didn't even claim self defense or defense of property, and got away with it 
In Canada? 
Yes, rural Saskatchewan. The teenager was native tho so it didn't matter 
It's so insignificant that there isn't even an article on this? 
Sure there is news about it, you ever heard of a thing called Google?

Are you Canadian? How did you not hear about this...the family testified before Parliment and shit 
Oooo. I thought you meant an innocent teen.. not some 22 year old accidentally shot while trying to steal a fucking truck while drunk.. justice fucking served right there. You really think the farmer is guilty? I feel that the crown should pay him for bringing him to court and taking up the time that he should be farming. 
Bahahaha 'accidentally shot'

"I was just shooting up in the air to scare them, I have no idea how a bullet entered the car and hit the guy passed out  in the passenger seat in the back of the head, I was just trying to scare them off I swear. The bullet just magically went in the back of the guys head when I shot it up in the air".

That was his defense

Anyways, my point is if the justice system here was like you are implying Stanley would he in jail.

But I see I touched a nerve since you are now spamming my inbox, cool 
Do you really think the murder of a drunk boy doing dumb shit is 'justice served'? If so, it's a good thing we don't have your version of justice or half the world's population would be under a grave stone before 16.
Dude was 22. He is driving drunk and b and eing with his buddies. Are you serious that we should not have any defense against an irresponsible adult that a menance to society?? Already then. 
Of course we should have defense, but you didn't say that. You called it 'justice served'. Next time you presume to judge whether being a drunk dickhead warrants death you should stop to remember that you have never bled to death on a stranger's farm and so perhaps more restraint is required on your part.
He wasn't driving. He was passed out at the time of being killed. He posed no threat to Stanley of his property. The 3 people who were actually attempting  to steal from Stanley were already running away when Boushie was killed. Again, Stanley's defense was not self defense or defense of property, his defense was he was shooting up in the air and the gun misfired and somehow hit a passed out guy in the back of the head at point blank range 
“If they would have just stopped — stopped drinking, stopped drinking and driving, stopped breaking into people’s places, stop vandalizing stuff, stop crashing into things. Just walk away.”. Yep.. they probably would not have been shot at. 
The Canadian Legal system has a goddamn point if you have the opportunity to leave the situation *but come back for more*?  Yeah you deserve to be charged.
"The situation" in this case being your home? Yeah, you should just take off and leave it behind, let the armed robbers have it. That'll totally keep them from ever victimizing anyone again.
Depends on the state. If it's Cali possibly. Florida? They were a danger until they ran off. 
armed men outside my house is not "remove yourself from danger". If I have children or my family inside I can reasonably say I was fearful for their lives so I made sure these guys fucked off.
Totally read this in Timothy Olyphant's voice 
White supremacist jerk-off fever dream as far as I can tell. 
You can call it whatever you want but when Apartheid ended, South Africa's fate was sealed. I don't know how you're deriving accusations of white supremacy from this. 
Yes, blacks tend to kill the most blacks, always, but blacks also tend to kill most of the other races too. The blacks are dying for cultural/social/economic reasons. The whites are being tortured and raped to death en masse because it is a hate fueled genocide, blacks killing white indiscriminately.
The racist morons are all over this thread, so you (and I) will be downvoted, but of course you're right. Their hyperbolic use of the word genocide only serves to cheapen its meaning in actual attempted genocides like the Yazidi in Iraq. 
I’m not at all informed on how the South African parliamentary system works.  Does new legislation need more than a simple majority?  Looking at how the EFF and ANC voted 241 in support and 83 opposed it would seem highly unlikely this wouldn’t become law, no?  I guess my point is it’s not something readily dismissible as populist grumblings, it has the majority of parliament in support. 
Botswana is okay apparently. Probably a few other countries too. 

SA and Rhodesia were great for white people back in the day. Now they're equal among all races. Equally shitty that is. 
Botswana is ok compared to what? Life expectancy is 15 years lower than the UK, murder rate is 12 times higher than the UK etc...
They're growing faster than the rest of the continent. They have potential. Is it somewhere some sheltered European would move? No. Is it an improvement over Ethiopia or Somalia? Yes. 

And the murder rate in the US is also way higher yet the whole world wants to move there. Mostly because people can make like twice the salary coming from a European country, never mind from a shithole.

The only reason SA got so bad in the first place anyway is tbh hat you Anglo pieces of shit starved them out with sanctions. Had you allowed a natural transition the terrorist ANC wouldn't have gotten power and maybe SA could have a sensible black government instead of these assholes. 
If South Africa wants a 'sensible black government' then they should go ahead and put one in place. Time to stop blaming other people.
The black majority will always vote ANC no matter what. SA will never have that sensible government that it could have had. They used to be a first world nuclear power, now look at them. Thank God they dismantled the nukes before giving over the government to them. 

The best SA can hope is for Boers to be able to hold some small piece of land in the case of the inevitable civil war when land grabs happen. And also for all the Anglos to be killed in the process. 
So by your own words it's the black majority that's the issue, and you think killing the Anglos will solve the problem?

Fucking hilarious mate. Got any more insightful comments?
The black majority will obviously vote for the ANC because they think the ANC "liberated" them. This is not in their best interest. But apparently they might start losing popularity so who knows, maybe they'll recover. I think they'll collapse in a decade though.

And Anglos dying doesn't solve anything, I just fucking hate Anglos. I'm Indian, it would be weird if I didn't hate Anglos. 
So you're just a racist then. k.
I feel like it's justified given the history. I'm not anti white either. Just anti Anglo. Go fuck yourself, Anglo. Oh wait you probably need a license for that. 
If It ain’t white, It ain’t right. 
Eh, the Chinese, Jews, and Indians do pretty well in the modern world. Probably other races too if you go further back. 
India is a shithole though.
So is China outside of first tier cities. India and China are shitholes because they don't care much about the quality of life of their less well off. Israel has the same issue to a lesser extent. 
Let's see, guy saying racist shit... yep, t_d poster. Make America hate again
/r/thedonald is leaking. Ever been to Africa? Or anywhere in Southern Africa?
First hand experience is not nor has ever been a prerequisite for criticism. 

If that were true you wouldn’t be able to criticize the president. 
THis is true, but for geography it makes a huge difference. I can mention metrics all day long about a country or city, but until you go it’s hard to have a good understanding of what it’s truly like there (ie, if it is a ‘shithole’ or not). A country may have a low GDP but it may be quite nice, stable, have hospitable people, have decent roads, etc. I’ve been to many countries that on paper are ‘shithole’ countries, but would love going back, enjoyed my time there, and everyone I met would never leave.
Extremely high crime rate per capita is a pretty good metric...
Not all of Africa has an extremely high crime rate.
Last pro tip: don’t forget your gun when you move.
There's a YouTube show that has this as a catchphrase. They review footage like this.
*The following advertisement is intended for Jim Boonie only*
So new you can spin your own narrative. Isis attack but strong Christians fights back.  Police raid black community but it goes wrong fast click here to watch. Trump supporters attack democrats and feel the wrath of gunless strength. Are cars dangerous??? Watch your local news at 10 to find out. 
What?
> So now you can spin your own narrative. Christians are fighting back against Isis. Trump supporters  feel the wrath of gunless strength after attacking democrats. Are cars dangerous? All this on your local news at 10.

I tried to FTFY.
It's new then.
Hello there!
Surprise, mothafucka
What else would we do all day?
Theres always a relevant XKCD!

https://xkcd.com/1683/
I have a very special set of skills
Same here! I was practically cheering!
Have to be careful with that or else your going along for the ride too
Yeah I thought it was gonna roll down the hill 
You and me both.
>They came to steal his car.

>They shot his dog.

>They knocked the head of his favorite parakeet named Petey.

>Three strikes and you're out. 

>This summer I'm Wick Dumber. 
I was hoping for An and Uzi akimbo and walking out all mellow like RoboCop. 
You hop into survival mode once people point guns at you.
It'll buff out
Considering how often this shit happens in SA it wouldn’t surprise me if this is like the 3rd or 4th time it’s happened to the dude and he just cracked and thought fuck this shit...
They tried to kill you potentially? Yeah very much worth especially now that they cant get away till the cops come
South African here. Where are very sick of crime in this country. This was only mildly satisfying to watch for me. I would have like to see all three of them dismembered.

Edit: Here is a very [satisfying one](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yTcoEe3y3MY). Also kind of funny - the guy stopping his truck to get in on the action.
I know some cars have/had sensors in even the rear bumper that would turn them off when hit.  You had to manually reset the switch to turn the car back on.  I don’t know if this is still a common thing, but this guy is lucky.

Edit: corrected autocorrect 
Yeah, that's that demo derby technique. I really liked the first hit.
You can do whatever you want if you have a mid-engined car 
This guy played Destruction Derby!
I was expecting the rains. 
Chance in a million
What do tigers dream of when they take a little tiger snooze?
Probably escaped from a zoo or something. 
Seems highly unlikely
I was expecting gunfire. 
This comment should have more likes
Maybe not wild but if you try to rob one it'd probably be livid.
If it lives in a house then it's not really wild is it.
You just have to download one from the dark web
No but you can legally own a tiger in South Africa. You can own several in fact.
Well, yeah, that's why expected it from the domicile.
Must have escaped from the zoo
I figured it was drug kingpins pet, sorry
Another link: https://streamable.com/0jrf3
Yes there is.
It's 2018. I even saw your responses. I feel like such a fool
https://i.imgur.com/dg7vj0N.jpg

This app has bamboozle protection built in!
bacon reader highlights YouTube links. haha
Wassup Bayern munich
You kiss your momma with that mouth?
You said bitch though?
[r/IdeserveIT](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=R7OlwXXsoHI)
Fool me once, shame on me. Second time, I check the URL.
Thats sir is why you dont fuck with homeless people
I use this mentality for years at the casino. I've yet to win more than I lose. 
r/iamverybadass
Really? I interpreted it more as a self deprecating joke insinuating his life was worthless and he didn't care if he died.
If the engine is in the rear, then don't back that ass up. Tru.
Many of them still have radiators in the front too, so you don't want to hit either end.
Now I'm wondering how a tesla would do in a derby
Generally rear engine cars still have cooling systems up front. Whether that's radiators or oil coolers. 
Fixed that for the fix... Yano. Smart cars would be great in this situation 
Murderous smart cars would be glorious. Until they take over the world.
I vaguely recall some sort of comedy sketch-esque thing with a concept involving murderous smart cars. 
Well, we have:

* Christine (Stephen king)
* Killer Cars (Stephen king)
* The Car (Elliot Silverstein)
* Goosebumps: The Haunted Car  (RL Stine)

Etc. My working theory is that these guys came here from the future and that they are trying their best to influence our culture so that we never trust self-driving cars. 
The glorious Smart ForTwo leaders of this planet will go far I’m sure. Until a gust of wind hits them 
>why not los dos

FTFY
Easy there, Axelrod.
> Maybe he crapped his pants in the excitement?

  


I know I did
Excrement 
Maybe he crapped his pants in the excrement?
Haha what? Is that real?
At that point it's more of a sex *defender*, right?
I guess when bullets are expensive, you have to be resourceful.
Explosive diarrhoea??
I think he gave the people in the truck his gun. So if the car got pulled over there’s no gun found. The police wouldn’t be looking for the people in the truck because the thief’s didn’t try to leave in the truck. Just my opinion. 
Almost definitely, you can see a muzzle flash just before they speed up.
That’s what I saw but I wasn’t sure haha 

And I also didn’t know the English words lol
All the things.
> I think 3 came out.

The way he was playing with his ass I think you're right.

"Just a minute guys, I've got an announcement to make which I'll do using that cctv camera and the medium of mime"
4 came out if you count the guy in the van ramming them! 
Well the smart ones are the ones doing the backing. 
[We now live in the RoboCop timeline.  That actually explains a lot](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7U4ZYOBzEEs)
Holy shit, could I introduce you to my friend? His name is the English language.
Huh.. some might go all their life not needing to learn english and you give hard time to someone who has learned some. Not everyperson in reddit speaks english. Or in the world.
Oh fuck off you white knight
Oh fuck off you useless asshole
Sorry. Didn't realize that i was in your safe space you precious lil' flower
Maybe if you had some precious in your life you wouldn't have to be such an asshole to people over the internet. Come on man, there's no need to be an asshole.
Na. Family, friends, leisure time, money, good looks. I have it all really. And the sun just came out. World looks great from my perspective. 

But you're still a precious lil' flower. Maybe one day, when you go out from your safe space, you'll grow to a tree. But until then: lol gay
How am I in a safe space? I told you to fuck off for being an asshole for no reason.

I'm happy that you are doing good, that's nice. But still, cmon.
Say the same thing you said when people replied to this comment.
What?
“Sorry. Didn't realize that i was in your safe space you precious lil' flower”
Oh, hello there. Are you one of those angry yet sensitive flowers? The ones that look like they have barbs but they're actually all soft? 

Well, I guess all white knights are to be honest. Do your worst kid. Try not to cry <:'(> while you're doing it. xoxo
Oh no mate, I am not even mildly annoyed. I’m just here for the shits and giggles.
Oh fuck off you black knight


None shall pass. 
Sorry. Didn't realize that i was in your safe space you precious lil' flower

I'm willing to bet English is their mother tongue.

It was an atrocious sentence. 
Classy
Lmao, thanks for this comment. Made my day.
It's £5 extra a month. 
Too bad it's too expensive over there.
Happy cake day!   
(☞ﾟヮﾟ)☞
As long as its against Afrikaners.
Why, do they give more of a shit about Anglos? 
I was expecting Die Antwoord to step out of the car.
Dude was shooting a gun on a bike at a moving target with a bunch of pedestrians around. I know it's a different culture and don't know the context, but I don't think you'd be saying it was fucking badass if he accidentally fatally shot a kid or innocent civilian, which you can clearly see there are plenty around during the video.

Looks 'badass', but real-life isn't a video-game and has actual consequences.
No, badass would be if the suspects were shooting back or using the car to try to run him off the road.
Mad Max.
I'm South African and have literally never heard of us being called saffas
I was just playing mate... Didn't mean to offend, the comment just made me laugh thats all
I fucking love this
They sometimes try (1:53 is when it heats up):

https://youtu.be/3n8KrdixvZc
Mostly because they didn’t want the ANC having nukes, not out of sheer altruism and a desire for a better world...
The apartheid regime was many things, but it was not stupid 
Lots of corpses.
The law isn't passes yet. It got approved in parliament but has to go through a review process with the supreme court. Final decision in august
They didn't pass any such law. Section 25 of the Constitution is still in effect. Stop repeating this divisive lie.
No we didnt. Fuck you people are dumb. 
https://m.news24.com/SouthAfrica/News/land-expropriation-without-compensation-what-you-need-to-know-20180228
Good law imo
Cape Verde and Mauritius too.
> Port Elizabeth

Bleak as in you end up in the water with a tyre tied around your legs? 

https://www.iol.co.za/news/south-africa/eastern-cape/body-of-missing-ironman-athlete-found-in-pe-harbour-14553349
Botswana KIND of, apart from the poverty, very narrow economy (diamonds and tourism is kind of it) and fact that 25% of the country is HIV+. 

But Namibia sorted out...? How do you figure that?

If you include Mauritius though, maybe them. 
Yeah if Europe didn’t have fucking water.
Cape Town is out of water.
/u/Hillary_For_Prison, they are close to it yes. Even though they are a very water efficient City, they have had a long streak of droughts. Probably  a taste of the future for many cities around the world. I’m sure they would love to be able to control the climate, but Cape Town is still a beautiful city and place to visit. Hopefully they get some much needed rain soon.
All those email spams must be bringing in a whole lot of revenues
Tunis in Tunisia is pretty great, Tripoli in Libya is still ok, Cairo and Alexandria in Egypt are pretty good if you have a good job too.
Something something Casablanca


Here is looking at you kid
In the USA we don't need armed private security forces to patrol neighborhoods. 
Ah, so a shithole then.
They're going to do it in 3.

Julius malema:

Hold my beer
He was guilty as fuck though 
Username checks out.
Yeah, The crazy thing is I grew up in Zimbabwe, and the crime rate is nothing like that of South Africa, there are no guns on the streets and generally I felt safe walking around the city in a way that I wouldn’t feel in many parts of South Africa.

Economically though South Africa is the better place at the moment.
Not if you're black. 
They were not even racing off. Seemed to be more like considering if they should leave or not and he was helping them decide with a mild display of force. I would own a rocket launcher if I lived in SA. Always wanted to blow a car up with one. 

If I could afford it a Javelin would be okay too. I assume it can lock onto a car. 
In South Africa they have to be an immediate threat. Someone running away from you is typically considered to be retreating and you can’t shoot at them, unless they are inside your home or vehicle.

Ramming them with your car once is ok, when he came back the second time it could get him in trouble.

That said, I don’t think anyone would actually prosecute this guy. The wording of the law does open them up to being prosecuted though.
You just said it's not genocide because their killing everyone, then you said it's genocide...
Well South Africans kill other blacks who are not South African (because they are not South African) they rape other blacks who are not South African. SA has a lot of immigrants and heavy xenophobia has been happening . I speak from experience when I say South Africans are just shit.
They're mass murdering white people for being white, often times raping and torturing them to death in the most sadistic ways imaginable - **that is the definition of hate fueled genocide you white hating racist**.

How unexpected! The white hater gaslights and calls someone stating facts racist, so I call them racist back, and off we go. The word racist is going to have zero meaning or power soon - the boy who cried wolf is a story you should've paid attention to. Sad and actually a bit scary that people talk and think like you now.
So basically how it works is that parliment needs to decide what to look into. In this case the EFF has been trying to get land redistribution onto the agenda for a long time. We've just got a new president with a majority party that is losing support rapidly. One way to get back in people's good books is to start punting the idea of land redistribution.

In this case the ANC basically agreed with the EFF that it should look at the how to legislate that. So the vote went ahead to look into the matter.

So basically where we stand now is that government will look to see how to go about it. There's no laws written or anything beyond a basic - yeah, we should look into this matter.

A lot can change depending on politics, and while there seems to be some agreement now - if it ever came up for an actual vote - you'll prob find the EFF not voting on it, cos it didn't go far enough.

Hope that helps!




It's not legislation, it's a motion. It isn't law 
Its a free f*ckin house!
General Kenobi!
my angel from my nightmare 
RemindMe! 8 years
wank
There's this new site called slashdot. It's all the rage now, all the cool people have already moved over. 
“I can drive stick”
ARE YOU PRIN?!
Car ramrod 
The skill to ram your car and not give a fuck.
This is not the case though. They were already on their way out and he decided to go after them and use his car as a weapon against armed thiefs. Thats the opposite of survival instinct. Thats just cold blooded revenge. He teached those assholes a lesson for sure
In Canada he would have been arrested for attempted murder.
I takenit kidnapping and extortion are the preferred rackets?
I got 4 secs into the video and couldn’t watch... to death(?!)
Down in Africaaaaaa
Not the 9 o'clock News?
Same with Texas.
I mean 
**Translation:**

Man: Anna, we have two, (men / but) don't worry.

Anna: There's only two?

Man: No, we have two thus far. We'll still get the others.

[Mumbling]

Woman: [Swearword], look there! Look how he points the gun.

Man: No that's nothing; I'll show you the whole thing now from the other side.

Woman: There(?) he grabs my mom's purse.

To new person entering room: Good evening.

[Mumbling] They're wearing light clothes?

Man: It's just the night vision. They are all actually wearing black trousers.

Man: And here they wanted to hijack a Nissan NP200 pickup (driving past)

Other man: Weird that he (driver of Nissan) didn't come back to the scene of the crime.

Woman: He was probably too scared.

As car reverses out of driveway, woman says: There you go dad / babe [not sure]!

Other voices: There we go. Check how that guy got flinged. Yeah, his leg's off hey.

Woman: He made a u-turn and came back. ... Oh my word, oh my word.

Other man: Klunk (funny sound effect)

Other voices: Play it again.

Woman: Jeez babe / dad [not sure].
I'll spare the trouble, it's [Apollo!](https://apolloapp.io/) Saving me from Rick and Manning for months now. Worth it.
Apollo ftw!
Bitch
*raises eyebrows* Hmm? 
I thought it's because they don't wash. 
Well that and they dont have what I want. They also have a shitty enough life without more people messing with them.
Does it matter if I have protection?
> If the engine is in the rear, then don't back that ass up.

**~ Abraham Lincoln**
Most rear engines cars are powerful enough that you're only going to need one hit. 
Mr2, vw bug and the Pontiac fiero: real powerhouses
The Pontiac fiero is mid engined, and neither of those cars are in production. 
radiators are pretty resilient I completely bent one on one of my cars nearly 40 degrees and it still cooled the car just fine.
Only crapped the front of my pants in the excitement 
That's why I only reddit on the toilet. 
No put there was that one time where two guys were fighting in the street and then ending up in a shop, got kidnapped and rapped by a man and a gimp
I think he's referring to this: http://motinews.info/news/two-burglars-sodomized-for-five-days-after-breaking-into-the-house-of-notorious-gay-rapist

Edit: call me cynical, but I think this might be fake!
"They broke in my front door, so I broke in their back doors!" 
It's from Pulp Fiction
Yes it is.
It is, look it up.
Lol https://us-east-1.tchyn.io/snopes-production/uploads/2016/10/harry-harrington.jpg
Oh god damn xD 
Every of the things. 
Wrong things.
How the hell would you ever get that smell out of your car?
What else would you expect from Lionel Luthor?
I was expecting a robot, but ^^^Chappie ^^^no ^^^crimes
Maybe that was him, and the wierd lookin chick is driving the getaway car.
It looked like most of his shots were taken without houses or people in the immediate background of the target to me, not that I condone the policy 
Lol he hit the car every time, and the crime is a different nature in that country. You have to be more brutal to make sure anyone lands in jail

And he was alone being shot at while on the bike. His interest is to stop the vehicle
Gun law states you are liable for where your rounds end up so if that had been the case where an innocent was injured, he might have been in the dock. However, the fact that the officer has opened fire means the suspect was party to a violent crime and has used his discretion to end the chase. It also means the suspect could likely have initiated the first violent contact. In other words you literally stop him dead before he kills an officer or an innocent.
I like how they didn't execute the black guy after he finally surrendered, shows how far backwards America is when you don't expect that to happen because it's in South Africa.
I pretth sure shooting black kid as a white cop in south Africa doesn't have consequences. 
We get called saffas by opposition fans when they come over for cricket.
I'm South African and have heard it often.
We get called Saffas all the time here in Australia.
The Brits and Aussies call us Saffas. 
I’m South African AND Australian and I still haven’t heard the term saffas before
Oh fuck I wasn’t offended. Just feeling bitchy I guess. And in all fairness my commentary is spectacularly obvious unless you don’t know about yarpie land. Probably not much of the world where there’s mad max crews raiding your driveway. 
So you're also subscribed to r/SouthAfrica
That was intense. South Africa feels like it's turning into Mad Max. Love that guy's accent.
I really feel like we're overdue for a GTA: South Africa.
Care to explain? I am an ignorant american but under the assumption such a law was passed. At least ive heard multiple sources refernece it. It cant completely be untrue can it?
Funny how much reddit cares about whites in SA. The term "white genocide" is often used.
Reddit hates racism. And what's happening in South Africa is racist
Reddit hates it because the victims are white, without google how many white farmer murders have there been in the last 20 years?
You are totally right. Look at how they are downvoting your comment. I am completely clueless why Reddit hates SA so much. 
Username checks out
Wait, no foul play is suspected?!?
A few items for Namibia:

It’s been quite stable there for some time now.

It has the first constitution written in gender neutral language and is widely considered to have one of the strongest legal frameworks for protecting and promoting women's rights in the world. Women make up 41.3 percent of the lower house in parliament, making it #11 in the world for women's national legislative representation. The US, for comparison, is #72.

Depending on the stats you consult, Namibia has dropped its HIV infection rate from about 22% to about 13% in less than ten years. This is crazy fast and unprecedented in the region. 

Mad Max:Fury Road was filmed in Namibia.
No you don’t. You just need them in schools. 
The politically correct term is shithouse. 
You're not a very nuanced person, are you?
The politicians sit up top and do the shitting down onto the people in the hole.
You're talking to a T_D poster. Only nuance they understand is "black = bad, white = good"
Yes it's a shit hole. I am going to the beach and watching the most shithole sunset in the shittest part of the world. Nothing to see here. Hope you stay the fuck away. Shithead. 
Average IQ is like 70 in Africa lol who the fuck would want to live there.
Oh it's the IQ argument again, everyone. Not sure how the fuck you figured that out considering there's never been any IQ testing at any level in the continent. 
It absolutly has, wtf are you talking about? 
Probably still higher than the state of Alabama.
For certain sure. He deserves every second he's locked up.
Using a rocket launcher will get you locked up real quick.

South Africa takes gun control seriously.
The Javelin is technically a missile. Is that better? :P
I understand. The white South Africans are just fine though. They just wanted to farm and live in peace once apartheid ended.
It's racist dude, not genocide. Learn the difference. Holocaust is genocide, lynching is racist.
Two bathrooms, no rugs
You are a bold one!
General Newgyfi
/r/unexpected prequelmemes
Holy shit 2026 is only 8 years away?! D: 
I will be messaging you on [**2026-04-21 12:13:49 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2026-04-21 12:13:49 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/Whatcouldgowrong/comments/8du3re/criminal_gang_in_south_africa_attempt_to_rob_the/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/Whatcouldgowrong/comments/8du3re/criminal_gang_in_south_africa_attempt_to_rob_the/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  8 years) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! dxq8uah)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|
American confirmed. (In that it is a special skill to drive stick)
*pats belly and rubs head*
-- Your mom.
Taught. 
The guy obviously went full badass and there's probably a good reason why he was robbed in the first place.

But Adrenaline is crazy in those situations man.
The adrenaline doesn't just stop the moment they stop pointing a gun at you.
There's two possible lessons they might have learned.

- Next time, come with more men and more guns

- or avoid that guy

Given that they are gangsters, they may rather go with the first :-/
I recently learned that once your brain gets put into “fight or flight mode” you are thinking from your amygdala and your reasoning skills go out the window. It can take a bit of time to shift out of that back to your frontal lobe which is more logical. 
fight or flight. It's not about high functioning rational and logical decisions it's kicking primal survival instincts, your animal desires for self preservation. Once his adrenaline dies down and he's back to normal he's probably thinking "fuck what I just did was insanely stupid."
It's also a good way to get shot. This whole video is madness.
Revenge? More like "Fuck you, robbers!"
'they'? Two went in, only one came out clutching themselves. Judging from comments here, Reddit Court has determined the homeowner is a Hero, even if everyone involved are pieces of shit IRL.

EDIT - full version below shows everyone who ran in ran out. Doesn't make the post less epic.
Gonna take some time 
[Gerald the gorilla](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=beCYGm1vMJ0)
It’s the director’s cut with commentary. 
Dirty needles bro.
I thought it was because if you fuck with them, they get pregnant and then you have a homeless baby.
That would be why you don't *fuck* them.
I thought it was because they've already clearly had a hard life so fucking with them isn't very nice. 
This is all kinds of wrong. In other words, a correct use of the internet.
Just like ramming with your car, you should only crap your pants from the rear so you don’t damage equipment and leak fluids.
> rapped by a man

Right across the knuckles, with a ruler.
Zed's dead.
Isn’t that what happened in Pulp Fiction?
I am surprised by how many people don't get the pulp fiction reference 
Pulp Fiction reference. 
Its Zed's, honey
Who is Z?
Z is dead. Z is dead...
A Tarantino production?
I drive a Toyota, tho. :l
Zeds dead
[Totally fake](https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/two-burglars-predator/). It's taken from the [Sunday Sport](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sunday_Sport), a UK tabloid which regularly features made-up articles.
Florida man at it again. 
Also, the name. Harry Harrington. And the very obviously photoshopped picture of him.
Why would I want to get it out? The scent of barbecued criminal scum is the only thing that gets my dick hard anymore. 
"Who cooked bacon in my car!?" 
Ok mate, no need to bring the cricket up.
Do any of you guys speak English? 
Thats racist
I live in the UK and I've never heard saffas
Never heard a brit say that. 
Thank you for your explanation, definitely some of us out here who aren't familiar with "~~yarpie land~~." (Edit: Sorry didn't mean any offense, first time seeing that term)
Two people being reconciling on the internet? What a time to be alive... 
Yes, it is completely untrue. 

A resolution passed the SA parliament to see if land reform without compensation would be constitutional. It has nothing to do with targeted seizure of land from white people. No such policy is occurring, and the person responding to you about "lots of deaths" is entirely fabricating it.
Literally 2 hours ago
http://www.xinhuanet.com/english/2018-04/21/c_137127229.htm
To be fair rhetoric is not the same as passing a law.  It’s a scary situation for whites in South Africa, don’t get me wrong but I don’t believe the guy getting downvoted is actually wrong here.
It's not, but if the government wants to do X but can't; not because they don't have a simple majority, but just not big enough of one to change the constitution, there is a very real (and actual) fear that those who do carry it out outside of the legal means will simply not be punished, which has been largely the case.
I would absolutely agree. 
[deleted]
The problem is, it's already happening. We have pictures of people raiding farms with cell phone jammers. Great it's not happening legally, but if government has shown it's intention to do the same thing, they aren't running in to protect farmers.

Edit: His comment was "it's not happening, yet." 
https://www.forbes.com/sites/lorenzomontanari/2018/03/14/fight-rages-over-land-reform-in-south-africa/

It hasn’t happened yet. Land reform/redistribution is being discussed though.


Ya’ll a bunch of racist downvoting /u/ostrich_semen and /u/digitalbitch2
Narrative vs facts.

The facts are that the ANC is in trouble in terms of their all time popularity, they are entertaining the land appropriation narrative because they hope it will earn them votes.

I have not heard of any land grabs (legally or otherwise) and still have family living in SA.

But but my narrative!!
No they were discussing if it would viable. No law has been passed and its against our constitution anyway. They don't have enough of a majority to change the constitution. Why do Americans on Reddit hate South Africa so much? The previous comment just replied that no law has been passed but has been downvoted. 
Because you are ruining everything 
Is this supposed to be a racist comment? Digitalbitch is right that it hasn’t been passed and so was the guy he was responding to. They’re being downvoted for facts because it doesn’t fit the racist narrative of Reddit? So then you argue digitalbitch or his people are ruining everything?
Is this supposed to be a racist comment?  
How about that no tolls on the freeways thing. That used to be against the constitution too. Not anymore
South Africa has had toll roads on freeways since the 1980s, long before the end of apartheid.
The new tolls. You know what I meant. The constitution said you can't place a toll on an existing road. They changed the constitution and did it 
> Why do Americans on Reddit hate South Africa so much?

Lies about South Africa are regularly spread by white nationalists on Reddit and elsewhere.
You mean you don't tie a tire to your legs when you go swimming at 2:00 AM? 
Tripped on a tyre, fell in the water, happend to get wrapped up in some wire on the way down? 
Namibia is where many Zimbabwe farmers moved to after Mugabe started his land grab there. And now south Africans too.  It has the second largest population of Afrikaners, after sa.
Hmm interesting. 

Their politicians are pretty awful, the HIV statistics dropping like that sounds like it would have to be due also to very poor conditions for those already with the disease just dying very fast - but more likely very different studies and extrapolations (the dirty secret is that AIDS prevalence figures, while awful, are very suspect throughout the region) and the place is dirt poor. 

As for women's representation, one specific issue, we could also look to Rwanda. But that's an interesting point. 
White South Africans are getting killed my point is South Africans will kill anyone it’s not just about the color. They batshit insane. Plenty of stuff doesn’t make it to the media. 
>my point is South Africans will kill anyone

*black* South Africans will kill anyone
Now I don't know enough about the situation at all to accurately say one or the other, but a genocide does not need to be on the scale of the holoucast. 


The Bosnian Genocide had a death count of 8,372 people and has been publicly accepted by the UN. 

Along with the definition being


>Genocide is intentional action to destroy a people in whole or in part. 
He had the high ground. 
We will watch your career with great interest!
2026 is as far away from 2018 as 2010. You're welcome for the depression :)
Or Canadian confirmed but their usually lumped in with Americans 
It always makes me feel super special when I see that they think manual gears are impressive. And they say women can't drive, ha!
Are sticks not common in a lot of countries? Forgive my ignorance. I know a little about driving practices and laws in some other countries but never looked into stick vs automatic. Although I think even state side a lot more people drive auto  these days but could be wrong 
As a German I specifically bought a “car with a stick” so I wouldn’t unlearn how to shift gears in one. My parents have now gotten an automatic car which they say drives more nicely, but I like my stick in the right hand if you know what I mean.


Not like it would matter much, I doubt I could’ve gotten an automatic at my budget anyway and I’ll be driving my now 11 year old tin can until it dies under my butt (the seat cracks every now and then, so this can be taken literally in a way).
This makes me so sad.  I fee personally responsible to teach my children to drive manual first.  Either that or I’m going to cash it all in and move to Europe just for this reason alone.   
Weird because I'm American and everyone I know can operate a manual transmission. 
Then you're an anomaly. [Only 18% of Americans know how to drive a manual](http://washington.cbslocal.com/2016/10/12/report-only-18-percent-of-americans-can-drive-manual/) and [only 3% of cars sold today are manual.](http://www.latimes.com/business/autos/laautoshow/la-fi-hy-disappearing-stick-shift-20161115-story.html) I'm an American and know how to drive a manual, but it is rare.
Wow, thanks for that. I had no idea how rare we are know. I guess I'm old or something now
The fact that you felt the need to point that out shows that it's uncommon. In the UK, that would be like saying 'weird because I'm British and everyone I know can breathe oxygen'.
Weird cause everyone I know can breath oxygen too. The fact that you pointed that out must mean it's really rare though. 
Teacheded
Why would there be a “good reason” for them to rob him?
Yeah the adneraline surely was a major reason of his actions. But I think this is different from the fight or flight scenario
"They were asking to get raped"  
  
Seriously is the guy not the victim? 
Robbed by blacks thinking that they are entilted to white man's property. If this person didn't fight back they'd probably end up burned and mangled like many other white SA. Fuck blacks
Even though you're a racist piece of shit that needs behavioral therapy so hopefully one day if you choose to reproduce you won't have racist cunts like yourself so the world could finally move forward, I'll still reply to you.

There's no way you can tell anyone's race from this video
I once found myself in a dangerous situation with drug dealers in South America and was buzzing for two days.

It was such an intense experience.
To do the things we never had
Now on DVD!
I read this as I hit the back button, had to come back in and find again to upvote 

>rapped


"I'M THE REAL SLIM SHADY, BITCH" *THWAP*
Never heard of it
No!


It’s was that one time where two guys were fighting in the street and then ending up in a shop, got kidnapped and rapped by a man and a gimp
Whoosh.jpg
No idea, let's wait for my friend Zed to arrive, he'll know if it's a reference.
Zed’s dead, baby. Zed’s dead.
What's a pulp fiction?  Is that like non-fiction or science fiction?
Found the UKranian and or Canadani
Are you also telling me that a donkey didn't rob a bank? 
Worst super hero ever! 
inb4 saffagate
The term Yarpie is offensive btw.
Crossfit 
Some people use cement. Just saying. 
I'm not talking about numbers. Genocide is systemic, as in you need the whole system in your side to get away with it. These are individual people who are making poor decisions.
You people are everywhere. 
I have a special skill? 
Same difference
No the opposite. In Europe (and South Africa, and elsewhere) we drive "stick", or manual, by default - usually learning from our first driving lesson. It's just the Americas where driving stick is some special skill. 
I’m in America and don’t know how to drive a stick. I’d love to learn but I don’t know anyone that has one. 
Sticks aren't common in the US. Something like 95% of drivers drive automatic and only 5-10% even know how to drive stick.
It’s the opposite in Europe. I used to drive an automatic, I had people refuse to drive it because they didn’t know how to drive an automatic. 
It's mostly just Canada and America here. It's a blessing! Drive a stick and nobody can steal your car!
'Holy fuck, there are 50% more pedals than I know how to use!'
Most people in the US only drive automatic.
Just in the backwards, non environmentally friendly countries. Automatic transmissions cost more but last longer and accelerate faster.
Based on how he handled that situation, this may have been retribution in the first place.

Obviously speculative and South Africa does have a major crime problem, but he handled this like he's been there before. 
At least I'm America, most criminals target other criminals instead of random people. 

You'd be surprised how dark and secretive the crime life is. 
Sometimes bad things happen to people as a result of their own actions. 

A woman getting raped =/= A criminal getting robbed by other criminals.

He shot them and then proceeded to badass run them over... twice. This is a man who finds himself in these sorts of situations.
It's more than 100 men or more could ever do
It's the movie where the guy gets tortured and has his ear cut off to the song 'Stuck in the middle with you'
That thief was such a jackass!
I've never been this disappointed
My bad! Was just quoting OP. Will amend. 
What's it mean?
Fucking yarpie
Did they make him pay $150 /month too?
Yeah, but this was in a trainer session. $100 per half hour.
From a certain point of view
If you’re with a group of friends and renting a car with the only option being manual, if you’re the only one that can drive it then you have a special skill 
You can't even find standards here anymore. I started leasing a car a couple years ago and I had to drive an hour and a half to pick up one with a manual transmission.
Thanks, I was wondering the same as /u/13pts35s.

^(have an upvote)
If you wanna buy one from a dealer, they would likely show you how.
It's not hard to learn. The first couple weeks are a bit nerve wracking and you avoid hills like the plague, but after that it becomes second nature.
I got one. I prefer driving stick over manual because it feels like i am actively driving versus sitting in a seat of a motorized vehicle. 
its just more work
No, this can and does happen to anyone there. All the time. Don't go to Johannesburg.
is it wise to rob a crazy suicidal fool? I don't think so... then again criminals can go either way on the intelligence scale
WOO ***Ooh***-OOH,***Oooh***-Ooh ***OOH***
It's raining men?
Never heard of it
I've never heard of it either but isn't that Reservoir Dogs? Which I also haven't heard of.
Ohh, the movie about the screaming painter. I like that movie. 
No no my friend.  You are thinking of Jackie brown. 
Found this on Google. 

yarpie. Origin. From Afrikaans japie, or plaasjapie meaning farm-boy. 'Japie' or 'plaasjapie' is a term referring to a person that grew up on a farm and is not familiar with city life, naive, often unsophisticated. Not a derogatory term, but not too polite either.

Is this right? lol
 What rental agency actually carries manuals
I was the only kid in school that drove manual.  I am the only adult that drives manual.  I'm so...lonely..
Unfortunately I’m not in a position to afford a car right now. Maybe in a few years once I’m out of school I can do that 
So I've heard.
Um-bongo, Um-bongo, they make it in the Congo.
Hallelu... nah. 
What? But it's super famous and won an Oscar.  This blonde chick is in a coma but then wakes up and is a super-ninja and the end makes David Carradine hang himself for sexual satisfaction.
You are thinking of 4 rooms, which I’ve never heard of, where the guy has the wallet that says bad motherfucker. 
Parents made me learn how to drive on a manual. Now having a manual is pretty much the best anti theft device a car can have 
So much harder to eat a cheeseburger driving a stick...
Never heard of it.
Is that the one where everyone's a rat at the end of it?
Never heard of it
Never heard of it. But to be fair, I’ve had my ears cut off to somebody playing “Stuck in the Middle With You.” 
wtf is a ninja
I can only assume you mean the British TV show "4 rooms" https://youtu.be/xHbEUjvu2MQ which is essentially a televised car boot sale.

^(*I actually genuinely hadn't heard of that film and will be watching it tonight!*)
